Arkansas, session 2025, SB493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:
*LGL061*
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the Board of Electrical
Examiners of the State of Arkansas.
(a) The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas is
abolished, and its authority, duties, function, records, contracts,
personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations,
and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing are
transferred to the Code Enforcement Licensing Board.
(b) The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas's
statutory powers, duties, and functions, including the functions of budgeting
or purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended
balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds are transferred to
the Code Enforcement Licensing Board.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the Board of Electrical Examiners of the
State of Arkansas does not affect the orders, rules, directives,
registration, licensing, or standards made or promulgated by the Board of
Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas before the effective date of
this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas shall
continue to be in effect until they are amended or repealed under authority
given by law.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the HVACR Licensing Board.
(a) The HVACR Licensing Board is abolished, and its authority, duties,
function, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of
appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of
budgeting or purchasing are transferred to the Code Enforcement Licensing
Board.
(b) The HVACR Licensing Board’s statutory powers, duties, and
functions, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, records,
contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations,
allocations, and other funds are transferred to the Code Enforcement
Licensing Board.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the HVACR Licensing Board does not affect
the orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or standards made or
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
promulgated by the HVACR Licensing Board before the effective date of this
act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the HVACR Licensing Board shall continue to be in effect until
they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the Arkansas Fire Protection
Licensing Board.
(a) The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board is abolished, and its
authority, duties, function, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds,
including the functions of budgeting or purchasing are transferred to the
Code Enforcement Licensing Board.
(b) The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board’s statutory powers,
duties, and functions, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing,
records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of
appropriations, allocations, and other funds are transferred to the Code
Enforcement Licensing Board.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board
does not affect the orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or
standards made or promulgated by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board
before the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board shall continue to
be in effect until they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the Elevator Safety Board.
(a) The Elevator Safety Board is abolished, and its authority, duties,
function, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of
appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of
budgeting or purchasing are transferred to the Code Enforcement Licensing
Board.
(b) The Elevator Safety Board’s statutory powers, duties, and
functions, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, records,
contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations,
allocations, and other funds are transferred to the Code Enforcement
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
Licensing Board.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the Elevator Safety Board does not affect
the orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or standards made or
promulgated by the Elevator Safety Board before the effective date of this
act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the Elevator Safety Board shall continue to be in effect until
they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 5. DO NOT CODIFY. Transfer of Plumbing Licensing and
Administration.
(a)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section,
the duties, functions, including the functions of budgeting and purchasing,
records, contracts, personnel, property, vehicles, and unexpended balances of
appropriations, allocations, and other funds, to implement, enforce, and
administer Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 38 and any related plumbing laws,
rules, directives, policies, and procedures, are transferred from the
Department of Health and the State Board of Health to the Code Enforcement
Licensing Board.
(2) The provisions of subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
not apply to plan review under § 17-38-201 and § 17-38-204.
(b)(1) The transfer of powers, duties, and functions, statutory or
otherwise, from the Department of Health and the State Board of Health to the
Code Enforcement Licensing Board under this act does not affect the orders,
rules, directives, registration, licensing, or standards made or promulgated
by the Department of Health or the State Board of Health under Arkansas Code
Title 17, Chapter 38, before the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the Department of Health and the State Board of Health
promulgated under Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 38 shall continue to be in
effect until they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. Transfer of Boiler Safety Licensing and
Administration.
(a) The duties, functions, including the functions of budgeting and
purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, to implement, enforce, and
administer Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 23, and any related boiler safety
laws, rules, directives, policies, and procedures, are transferred from the
Boiler Inspection Division, the Division of Labor, and the Department of
Labor and Licensing to the Code Enforcement Licensing Board.
(b)(1) The transfer of powers, duties, and functions, statutory or
otherwise, from the Boiler Inspection Division, Division of Labor, and
Department of Labor and Licensing to the Code Enforcement Licensing Board
under this act does not affect the orders, rules, directives, registration,
licensing, or standards made or promulgated by the Boiler Inspection
Division, Division of Labor, and Department of Labor and Licensing under
Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 23, before the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or
standards of the Department of Health and the State Board of Health
promulgated under Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 23 shall continue to be in
effect until they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-28-101(1), concerning the definition of
air conditioning electrician, is repealed.
(1) “Air conditioning electrician” means an individual who is
limited to a license classification possessing the necessary qualifications,
training, and technical knowledge for the installation, maintenance, and
extension of electrical conductors and equipment solely for the purpose of
supplying heating and air conditioning and refrigeration units;

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-28-101(12)(C)(i)(a), concerning
definitions pertaining to electricians, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i)(a) Maintaining and repairing parking lot lights,
upon successfully passing a separate examination approved by the Board of
Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing
Board.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-28-102(c)(1), concerning the
construction and exemptions of line voltage power wiring, is amended to read
as follows:
(c)(1) Any holder of a state-issued heating, ventilation, air
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
conditioning, and refrigeration, or HVACR, license may run line voltage power
wiring in compliance with the state electric code from a disconnect box to an
outdoor HVACR unit within a distance not to exceed ten (10') seventy-five
(75') feet from any point of the HVACR equipment without obtaining an
electrician's license as required by this chapter.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-28-103 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-103. Disposition of funds.
All funds received by the Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of
Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board under the provisions of this
chapter shall be deposited as special revenues into the State Treasury to the
credit of the Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund. Department of Labor and
Licensing Special Fund, there to be used by the Division of Labor in carrying
out the functions, powers, and duties as set out in this chapter and to
defray the costs of the maintenance, operation, and improvements required by
the division in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties otherwise
imposed by law on the division or the Director of the Division of Labor.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-28-201 is repealed.
17-28-201. Creation – Members.
(a) There is created a Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of
Arkansas.
(b) The board shall consist of the Secretary of the Department of
Labor and Licensing or his or her authorized representative and eight (8)
other members who shall be residents of this state appointed by the Governor
with the advice and consent of the Senate:
(1) One (1) member shall be the chief electrical inspector of a
municipality within the state;
(2) One (1) member shall be a licensed professional engineer as
defined in § 17-30-101 engaged primarily in the design or maintenance of
electrical installations;
(3) One (1) member shall be an electrical contractor operating
in this state;
(4) One (1) member shall be a master or supervising electrician;
(5) One (1) member shall be a representative of a public
electric utility operating in this state;
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(6) One (1) member shall be a representative of a private
electric utility operating in this state;
(7) One (1) member shall represent the public and shall not be
affiliated with any of the other groups represented on the board; and
(8) One (1) member shall represent the elderly, shall be sixty
(60) years of age or older, and not actively engaged as or retired as an
electrician. This member shall be appointed from the state at large, subject
to confirmation by the Senate, and shall be a full voting member but shall
not participate in the grading of examinations.
(c) The same person may not be both the public representative and the
representative of the elderly.
(d) Each appointment shall be for a term of four (4) years or until a
successor is appointed.
(e) In the event of a vacancy during a term, the Governor may appoint
a replacement to fulfill the unexpired portion of the term.
(f) The board shall elect one (1) of its members to act as its chair
for a term of one (1) year, and he or she shall have a vote on all matters
before the board.
(g) For cause and after a hearing, any appointed member may be removed
from office by the Governor.
(h) Each appointed member may receive expense reimbursement and
stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-28-202 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-202. Duties of Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of
Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board and Department of Labor and
Licensing.
(a) It shall be the duty of the Board of Electrical Examiners of the
State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board to:
(1) Adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this chapter
and § 17-55-101 et seq.;
(2) At least every six (6) months, conduct examinations of
persons who apply for an electrician's license and grant licenses to
qualifying applicants who have paid the prescribed fee;
(3) Grant licenses to qualifying applicants for an electrical
inspector's license under § 17-55-101 et seq.; and
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(4) Revoke or suspend the license of any licensee or the
certification of any electrical apprentice for cause.
(b)(1) It shall be the duty of the Department of Labor and Licensing
to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(2) For the enforcement of this chapter, the Secretary of the
Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designated employees shall
have the authority to enter, during normal business hours, upon any private
or public premises with right of access, ingress, and egress for the purpose
of ascertaining whether a person has performed electrical work or installed
or repaired electrical facilities in accordance with this chapter, the
Arkansas Electrical Code Authority Act, § 20-31-101 et seq., and the rules
and standards adopted pursuant thereto.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 17-28-203(a), concerning fees for the
licensing examinations of electricians, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code
Enforcement Licensing Board is authorized to conduct examinations of persons
applying for a license as a master electrician, journeyman electrician,
industrial maintenance electrician, residential master electrician, air
conditioning electrician, specialist sign electrician, or residential
journeyman electrician. These persons shall pay fees established by the
board, but in no event shall such examination fees exceed the following:
(1) Master electrician ............. $100.00
(2) Journeyman electrician ............. 100.00
(3) Industrial maintenance electrician ............. 50.00
(4) Residential master electrician ............. 100.00
(5) Residential journeyman electrician ............. 100.00
(6) Air conditioning electrician ............. 100.00
(7)(6) Specialist sign electrician with parking lot endorsement
............. 100.00

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 17-28-204 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-204. Hearing – Appeal.
All hearings conducted by the Board of Electrical Examiners of the
State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board and all appeals taken from
the decisions of the board shall comply with the Arkansas Administrative
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 17-28-301 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-301. Electrician's license — Issuance and renewal — Fees.
(a) Individuals passing the master, journeyman, residential master,
residential journeyman, air conditioning electrician, specialist sign
electrician, or industrial maintenance electrician's examination as specified
in § 17-28-203 shall be issued a license of the same class as that of the
examination upon payment of the following fees:
(1) Master electrician ............. $50.00
(2) Journeyman electrician ............. 25.00
(3) Industrial maintenance electrician ............. 25.00
(4) Residential master electrician ............. 50.00
(5) Residential journeyman electrician ............. 25.00
(6) Air conditioning electrician ............. 25.00
(7)(6) Specialist sign electrician with parking lot endorsement
............. 25.00.
(b)(1) Licenses shall expire on the date indicated on the licenses.
(2) The license may be renewed for a period of one (1), two (2),
or three (3) years year with the fee to be as follows:
(A) Master electrician ............. $50.00 per year
(B) Journeyman electrician ............. 25.00 per year
(C) Industrial maintenance electrician ............. 25.00
per year
(D) Residential master electrician ............. 50.00 per
year
(E) Residential journeyman electrician ............. 25.00
per year
(F) Air conditioning electrician ............. 25.00 per
year
(G)(F) Specialist sign electrician with parking lot
endorsement ............. 25.00 per year.
(3) A licensee may renew his or her license within thirty-six
(36) months following the expiration date on the license by paying:
(A) The renewal fee under subdivision (b)(2) of this
section;
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(B) A late fee equal to one (1) year of the renewal fee
plus ten dollars ($10.00) for each calendar month between the expiration date
indicated on the license and the date of application for renewal; and
(C) Any outstanding monetary civil penalty.
(4) If a licensee shall fail to renew his or her license within
thirty-six (36) months after the expiration date on the license, the licensee
may reinstate his or her license by retaking the examination required under §
17-28-203 and paying:
(A) The fees and any applicable penalty under subdivision
(b)(3) of this section; and
(B) An additional penalty of one thousand dollars
($1,000).
(5)(A) The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of
Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board may, after hearing, deny renewal or
reinstatement of a license for cause.
(B) The applicant for renewal or reinstatement of a
license may obtain a temporary license to expire on the date of his or her
hearing before the board.
(6) If a person simultaneously holds an electrical inspector
license and a license as a master electrician or a journeyman electrician,
the person, when renewing his or her master electrician or journeyman
electrician license, shall be exempt from the:
(A) Renewal fee under this section; and
(B) Continuing education requirements for master
electricians and journeyman electricians under § 17-28-311.
(c) The registration fee for an electrical apprentice shall be ten
dollars ($10.00) annually. Apprentice registration certificates shall expire
on the last day of the month, one (1) year following the date of original
registration.
(d)(1) The board may issue a temporary license as a master electrician
or journeyman electrician that is valid for no more than six (6) months and
renewable one (1) time only for industry projects as defined in this chapter,
upon submission by the applicant of the following:
(A) A temporary license fee in the amount established by
subsection (a) of this section;
(B) A completed application on a form furnished and
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
approved by the board; and
(C) Evidence that the applicant:
(i) Holds a current license of the same
classification issued by another state; or
(ii) Meets the experience qualifications required
under rules promulgated by the board for a temporary master electrician or a
temporary journeyman electrician.
(2) The Director of the Division of Occupational and
Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and
Licensing may renew a temporary license as a master electrician or journeyman
electrician issued by the board for more than one (1) additional period of
six (6) months, if:
(A) The renewal is for work to be performed on a specific
industry project as defined in this chapter;
(B) The director department determines that the additional
renewal is necessary because:
(i) Actual construction will exceed one (1) year;
and
(ii) An insufficient number of licensed electricians
is available to perform the necessary work;
(C) The temporary license is restricted to the industry
project for which it is issued; and
(D) A temporary license fee in the amount established in
subsection (a) of this section is paid.
(3)(A) The board may issue and renew a temporary license as a
master electrician or journeyman electrician for regularly scheduled or
emergency maintenance work or shutdowns of not longer than six (6) weeks on
industry projects as defined in this chapter.
(B) An applicant for a new or renewed temporary license
under subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section shall submit the same items as
are required in subdivision (d)(1) of this section.
(e) A specialist sign electrician under § 17-28-101 shall qualify for
an endorsement on his or her license authorizing the licensee to maintain and
repair parking lot lights upon successfully passing a separate examination as
approved by the board.

03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 17-28-302 is repealed.
17-28-302. Electrical contractor license.
(a) Any person, member, or employee of a firm, partnership, or
corporation desiring to engage in the business of electrical contractor may
apply for and be issued a license upon satisfying the Board of Electrical
Examiners of the State of Arkansas that he or she or it is either a master
electrician or employs a master electrician as its superintendent or manager
and shall pay a license fee in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per
year.
(b) Any electrical contractor having met the requirements of this
chapter may work in any municipality in the state without further
examinations after first showing evidence of state license as described in
this chapter and paying such fees as required by the municipality in which
the work is to be performed.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 17-28-303 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-303. License nontransferable.
No license certificates issued by the Board of Electrical Examiners of
the State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board shall be assignable or
transferable.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 17-28-305(b)(1), concerning the local
regulatory authority for electrical work, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A city or town may by ordinance, rules, regulations, or
contract prescribe rules, regulations, and standards for the materials used
in the construction, installation, and inspection of all electrical work in
the city or county, provided the rules, regulations, or standards are not in
conflict with the standards prescribed by the Board of Electrical Examiners
of the State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board under § 17-28-
202, § 17-55-101 et seq., and § 20-31-104.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 17-28-306 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-306. Reciprocity.
The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code
Enforcement Licensing Board shall be authorized to issue licenses to those
applicants holding equivalent licenses in other states, upon payment of the
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
required fees and submission of proof of license in that state, provided an
agreement has been reached with that state to recognize the electrical
licenses held by Arkansas residents.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 17-28-307(a)(1), concerning restricted
lifetime licenses for master and journeyman electricians, is amended to read
as follows:
(a)(1) Upon reaching the age of sixty-five (65), or any time
thereafter, any person who has been a licensed master electrician or a
licensed journeyman electrician licensed by the Board of Electrical Examiners
of the State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board for not less than
twelve (12) years may apply for a restricted lifetime master electrician
license or a restricted lifetime journeyman electrician license.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 17-28-308 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-308. Electrical apprentices.
(a) Upon proper application and payment of the fee, the Board of
Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing
Board shall register as an electrical apprentice and issue a certificate of
registration to any person who furnishes satisfactory proof that the
applicant is enrolled in a school or training course for electrical
apprentices certified by the United States Office of Apprenticeship.
(b) The board shall take such actions as are reasonably necessary or
appropriate to supervise and enforce apprenticeship supervision ratios
established by the board by rule.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
an apprentice who has successfully completed a certified school or training
program and has been released for testing may continue to renew his or her
apprentice registration card, if otherwise qualified, without enrolling in a
school or training program shall test within one (1) year of release by the
Office of Skills Development.
(d) Application for an initial certificate of registration and renewal
of an electrical apprentice shall be the responsibility of the school or
training course for electrical apprentices certified by the United States
Office of Apprenticeship in which the electrical apprentice is enrolled.
(e) The school or training course for electrical apprentices certified
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
by the United States Office of Apprenticeship in which the electrical
apprentice is enrolled shall be responsible for documenting on-the-job
training hours of apprentice electricians and submitting completion of hours
to the board.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 17-28-309 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-309. Penalties.
(a) The Director of the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee is authorized to petition any court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin or restrain any person who performs
electrical work without a license or who otherwise violates the provisions of
this chapter.
(b)(1) A civil penalty may be assessed against any person, firm, or
corporation by the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Boards
and Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing and subject to appeal and
hearing before the Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas
according to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.,
if it is determined that a person, firm, or corporation has violated any:
(A) Provision of this chapter;
(B) Provision of the Arkansas Electrical Code Authority
Act, § 20-31-101 et seq.;
(C) Rule or order issued or promulgated by the board Code
Enforcement Licensing Board; or
(D) Condition of a license, certificate, or registration
issued by the board.; or
(E) Licensure eligibility concerning criminal records
under § 17-3-102.
(2) For each violation, the penalty shall not exceed the
following: one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day.
(A) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first offense;
(B) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for a second
offense; or
(C) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a third offense.
(3) Each day of a continuing violation is a separate violation
for purposes of penalty assessment.
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(4)(A) Assessment of a civil penalty by the board shall be made
no later than two (2) years after the date of the occurrence of the
violation.
(B) No civil penalty may be assessed until the person
charged with the violation has been given the opportunity for a hearing on
the violation.
(5) If any person, firm, or corporation against whom a civil
penalty has been imposed fails to pay the penalty within sixty (60) days of
the board’s decision, the director secretary or his or her designee may file
an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to collect the civil penalty
without paying costs or giving bond for costs.
(6) Any penalties collected under this section shall be
deposited as special revenues into the State Treasury to the credit of the
Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund. Department of Labor and Licensing
Special Fund, there to be used by the Department of Labor and Licensing in
carrying out the functions, powers, and duties of this chapter.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 17-28-310 is repealed.
17-28-310. Grandfather clause.
(a) Applicants for a license under this chapter shall be exempt from
the examination requirement of § 17-28-203, provided that the applicant:
(1) Is qualified by experience requirements to take the
examination for a particular license classification under the provisions of
this chapter and the rules of the Board of Electrical Examiners of the State
of Arkansas;
(2) Has not had a municipal electrician's license or a state
electrician's license of any classification revoked or suspended for cause;
(3) Submits the appropriate fee; and
(4) Applies for a license before July 1, 1998.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, an applicant for a
license under this section shall be exempt from the journeyman electrician
examination requirement of § 17-28-203 if he or she has completed electrical
apprenticeship training and education under a bona fide apprenticeship
program registered with the United States Office of Apprenticeship and he or
she meets the requirements of subdivisions (a)(2)-(4) of this section.
(c) An applicant for a specialist sign electrician license under this
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
chapter shall be exempt from the examination requirement of § 17-28-203 if
the applicant:
(1) Is qualified by experience requirements to take the
examination for a particular license classification under this chapter and
the rules of the board;
(2) Has not had a municipal electrician's license or a state
electrician's license of any classification revoked or suspended for cause;
(3) Submits the appropriate fee; and
(4) Applies for the specialist sign electrician license before
September 1, 2009.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 17-28-311 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-311. Continuing education requirement.
(a) A journeyman electrician licensee, residential journeyman
electrician licensee, or master electrician licensee, or residential master
electrician licensee shall complete at least eight (8) hours of continuing
education for each the current National Electrical Code cycle in the first
year of each new code cycle before renewing his or her license.
(b) If a licensee fails to obtain the required continuing education
hours within a National Electrical Code cycle under subsection (a) of this
section, the licensee may not renew his or her license until the licensee:
(1) Obtains the required continuing education hours and submits
proof of completion of the continuing education hours to the Department of
Labor and Licensing as required by the rules of the Board of Electrical
Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board; and
(2) Pays all fees and penalties required under § 17-28-301.
(c) The board shall promulgate rules to set standards for continuing
education for licensees under this section.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 17-28-312(b)(3)(B), concerning rules for
the supervision of apprentice electricians, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas
Code Enforcement Licensing Board shall promulgate rules which determine the
regular and reasonable intervals under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section
in consideration of the:
(i) Nature of the work; and
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(ii) Skill and experience of the apprentice
electrician.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 17-33-101(8), concerning definitions
pertaining to HVACR workers, is amended to read as follows:
(8) “HVACR gas fitting work" means gas fitting work for the purpose of
supplying an HVACR system and shall be limited to installing six feet (6′)
seventy-five feet (75’) or less final of gas piping connection to a heating
unit from an existing, accessible manual safety shutoff gas cock, installing
flue gas vents and combustion air for the HVACR system;

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 17-33-101(16)(A), concerning definitions
pertaining to HVACR workers, is amended to read as follows:
(A) Does not hold a Class A, Class B, Class C, Class D, or
Class E HVACR license;

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 17-33-103(b), concerning HVACR electrical
work, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Any individual licensed or registered to perform HVACR work may
perform electrical connections to heating and air conditioning units without
obtaining any other license to perform the work, so long as the connection is
made to a disconnecting means suitable in capacity for the equipment to be
served and is provided by others within ten feet (10′) seventy-five feet (75’)
of the unit.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 17-33-105(a)(1)(A)(i), concerning
penalties, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A)(i) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or
violates any rule or order of the HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement
Licensing Board or any permit, license or certification may be assessed a
civil penalty by the board in accordance with the rules issued by the board.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 17-33-201(a), concerning the members of
the HVACR Licensing Board, is amended to read as follows:
(a) There is hereby created the HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement
Licensing Board to be composed of nine (9) eleven (11) members appointed by
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
the Governor and confirmed by the Senate. The board shall be composed of the
following members who shall be residents of the State of Arkansas:
(1) The secretary of the board shall be a representative of the
Department of Labor and Licensing;
(2) Two (2) members of the board shall be Class A license
holders whose business is located in the State of Arkansas;
(3) Two (2) members of the board shall be Class B license
holders whose business is located in the State of Arkansas;
(4) One (1) member of the board shall be a mechanical engineer
registered in the State of Arkansas who is directly associated with HVACR
design;
(5) One (1) member of the board shall be a representative of a
city or county HVACR inspection program;
(6) One (1) member of the board shall be a consumer with no
personal or financial interest in the HVACR industry; and
(7) One (1) member of the board shall be a member of the
Mechanical Contractors Association of Arkansas, Inc., who holds a current
state contractor's license.
(1) One (1) member shall be an electrical contractor operating
in this state;
(2) One (1) member shall be a master electrician;
(3) One (1) member shall be a Class A HVACR license holder
whose business is located in this state;
(4) One (1) member shall be a Class B HVACR license holder
whose business is located in this state;
(5) One (1) member shall be a master plumber;
(6) One (1) member shall be a representative of the
manufacturers of elevators within this state;
(7) One (1) member shall be a representative of the elevator
mechanics within this state;
(8)(A) Two (2) members shall be a licensed professional
engineer as defined in § 17-30-101.
(B) One (1) member under subdivision (a)(8)(A) of this
section shall be engaged primarily in the design and construction of
electrical and mechanical installations.
(C) One (1) member under subdivision (a)(8)(A) of this
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
section shall be engaged primarily in plumbing design;
(9) One (1) member shall be a representative of a city or
county building inspection program; and
(10) One (1) member shall be active in the installation and
servicing of fire protection systems.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 17-33-202 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-202. Powers and duties.
The HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board may:
(1) Adopt certain rules to ensure the proper administration and
enforcement of this chapter;
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B) of this section,
adopt a mechanical code and standards for the conduct of HVACR work.
(B) A mechanical code or standard adopted under
subdivision (2)(A) of this section shall not prohibit or limit the use of a
refrigerant designated as acceptable for use in accordance with 42 U.S.C. §
7671k, as it existed on January 1, 2023, if the equipment containing the
refrigerant is listed and installed in accordance with the safety standards
and use conditions established in accordance with 40 C.F.R. §§ 82.170 —
82.184, as they existed on January 1, 2023;
(3) Assist and advise the Department of Labor and Licensing on
all matters related to the licensing of HVACR maintenance work;
(4) Conduct hearings on all matters related to the licensing and
inspection of HVACR work;
(5) Establish HVACR code inspection programs;
(6) Conduct investigations into the qualifications of applicants
for licensure at the request of the department;
(7) Review applications for examination for a Class A, Class B,
Class C, Class D, Class E, and Class L license;
(8) Establish by board rule a minimum level of general liability
insurance coverage for a license if the board determines that a specific
class of license requires insurance coverage;
(9) Establish by board rule a maximum of four (4) eight (8)
hours per year International Mechanical Code cycle of continuing education if
the board determines that a specific class of license requires continuing
education;
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(10) Assist and advise the department in other such matters as
requested by the department; and
(11) Establish fees for the proper administration of the
requirements of this chapter.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 17-33-203 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-203. Administrative procedures.
For the purpose of this chapter, all hearings conducted by the HVACR
Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board and all appeals taken from
the decisions of the board shall be pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 17-33-204 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-204. Fees.
(a)(1) The HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board
shall adopt a fee schedule by rule and regulation. The fee schedule may
include, but is not limited to:
(A) Testing fees;
(B) License fees;
(C) Civil penalty fees;
(D) Registration fees;
(E) Inspection fees;
(F) Fees for code books Renewal fees;
(G) Late renewal fees; and
(H) Late penalty fees.
(2) The board may provide for a reduction in the fees of a
person or partnership who holds one (1) or more licenses determined by the
board to be HVACR-related and for which the board determines a reduction in
fees should be allowed.
(b) Until a fee schedule is established by the board, the licensure
and registration fees shall be as follows:
Class A License ............. $200.00
Class B License ............. 150.00
Class C License ............. 100.00
Class D License ............. 150.00
Class E License ............. 150.00
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
Class L License ............. No Charge
Registration Fee ............. 25.00.
(c) The fees established by the board for licensure and registration
shall not exceed the amounts provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 17-33-205 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-205. Disposition.
(a)(1) All fees or payments of any type collected by the HVACR
Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board under this chapter shall be
deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues, and the Treasurer of
State shall credit those fees or payments to the “HVACR Licensing Fund” which
is hereby created “Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund” created under § 19-
6-846, there to be used as provided by law.
(2)(A) All funds deposited into the HVACR Licensing Fund shall
be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the HVACR
Licensing and Inspection Program of the Department of Labor and Licensing.
(B) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is hereby
authorized, from time to time, to make transfers of moneys from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund as loans to the HVACR Licensing Fund to be used for
maintenance and operation of the program. Provided, that any such moneys
loaned from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the HVACR Licensing Fund
shall be repaid from fees derived from the program on or before the last day
of the fiscal year in which the loan of the funds is made.
(3)(2) Subject to such rules as may be implemented by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, the disbursing officer for the Department of
Labor and Licensing is hereby authorized to transfer all unexpended funds
relative to the program that pertain to fees collected, as certified by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to be carried forward and made available
for expenditures for the same purpose for any following fiscal year.
(b) Any moneys received from the sale or trade of motor vehicles and
other capital equipment purchased with HVACR licensing funds shall be
credited to the HVACR Licensing Fund Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 17-33-302(a)(2), concerning licensure
qualifications for HVACR workers, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Make application to the Department of Labor and Licensing on
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
forms prescribed by the HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing
Board;

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 17-33-303 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-303. Classes of licenses.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, every individual who
designs, installs, constructs, maintains, services, repairs, alters, or
modifies any HVACR system or any portion of an HVACR system in the State of
Arkansas shall obtain one (1) of the following classes of license and pay the
fees prescribed by the HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing
Board;
(1) Class A — Entitles the licensee to perform HVACR work
without limitation to BTUH or horsepower capacities;
(2) Class B — Entitles the licensee to perform HVACR work on
air conditioning systems that develop a total of not more than fifteen (15)
twenty-five (25) tons of cooling capacity per unit or one million (1,000,000)
BTUH heating input per unit and refrigeration systems of fifteen horsepower
(15 h.p.) or less per unit;
(3) Class C — Entitles the licensee who is in the business of
servicing and repairing heating, ventilation, air conditioning, or
refrigeration equipment for the public to service, repair, or replace
components of HVACR equipment and to perform HVACR work on air conditioning
systems that develop a total of not more than fifteen (15) tons of cooling
capacity per unit or one million (1,000,000) BTUH heating input per unit and
refrigeration systems of fifteen horsepower (15 h.p.) or less per unit. A
Class C license holder shall not install any original HVACR equipment or
replace any existing HVACR equipment;
(4)(3) Class D — Entitles the licensee to perform sheet metal
work as it relates to ductwork for HVACR systems without regard to or
limitation of horsepower of the system to which the duct connects. The
licensee in this category is prohibited from the sale, installation, and
service of HVACR equipment and systems;
(5)(4) Class E — Entitles the licensee to perform refrigeration
work as defined in § 17-33-101 without regard to or limitation of horsepower.
The licensee in this category is prohibited from the sale, installation, and
service of heating and air conditioning equipment used for the treatment of
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
air for human comfort requirements; and
(6)(5) Class L — Entitles a licensee to apply for and obtain a
restricted lifetime license without having to pay a license fee in any
specific category of license as defined in this chapter. The applicant must
be at least sixty-five (65) years of age and hold a current license in good
standing with the board. The board shall promulgate rules to define the
specific requirements of the lifetime license.
(b) The board shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
(c)(1) An individual may perform HVACR work under a Class A, Class B,
Class C, Class D, or Class E HVACR license holder by registering with the
Department of Labor and Licensing.
(2) The registrant shall pay an annual registration fee as
required by the board. Annual registration, including without limitation
payment of the fee as required by the board, for the registrant shall be the
responsibility of the HVACR license holder.
(3) All licensees are responsible for ensuring that all HVACR
employees hold a current HVACR registration or HVACR license.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 17-33-304 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-304. Display of license number.
Every individual licensed under this chapter shall display his or her
HVACR license number on all his or her business vehicles and in all forms of
advertising in a manner prescribed by the rules promulgated by the HVACR
Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board.

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 17-33-305 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-305. Ground for denial.
All applicants who meet the requirements for licensure or registration
shall be issued the appropriate license or registration, except that the
HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board may deny a license if
the applicant has:
(1) Committed any act which if committed by a licensee or
registrant would be grounds for suspension or revocation of the license or
registration;
(2) Previously been denied a license or registration under this
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
chapter for cause or previously had a license or registration revoked for
cause; or
(3) Knowingly made any false statement or misrepresentation on
the application.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 17-33-306 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-306. Expiration and renewal.
All licenses or registrations issued under this chapter shall expire
one (1) year after the date of issuance or at a time specified by the HVACR
Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board of the Department of Labor
and Licensing. To renew a license or registration, the licensee must submit
to the Department of Labor and Licensing before the expiration date on a form
prescribed by the department the appropriate license or registration fees
required by this chapter.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 17-33-307 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-307. Grounds for suspension or revocation.
The HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board, on its own
motion, may make investigations and conduct hearings and, on its own motion
or upon complaint in writing signed and verified by the complainant, suspend
or revoke any license or registration if it finds that the holder of the
license or registrant has:
(1) Made a material misstatement in the application for license
or registration or renewal thereof;
(2) Demonstrated incompetency to act as a license holder or
registrant according to rules and standards promulgated by the board; or
(3) Violated any provisions of this chapter or any rule or order
prescribed by the board.; or
(4) Pled guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of
any offense listed under § 17-3-102.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 17-33-308(c), concerning the procedure for
suspension or revocation HVACR workers' licenses, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) Any member of the HVACR Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing
Board or a representative designated by the board shall have the authority to
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
administer oaths for the taking of testimony.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 17-38-101(3), concerning definitions
pertaining to plumbers, is amended to read as follows:
(3) “Board” means the State Board of Health Code Enforcement
Licensing Board;

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code § 17-38-101(4), concerning definitions
pertaining to plumbers, is amended to read as follows:
(4) “Department” means the Department of Health Department of
Labor and Licensing;

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 17-38-102(b), concerning prohibited acts
pertaining to plumbers, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Any person who shall do any act prohibited in this chapter or fail
to obey a lawful order of the Department of Health Code Enforcement Licensing
Board or a judgment or decree of a court in connection with this chapter
shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three
(3) months or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500). Each day
during which the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 17-38-102(d)(1), concerning penalties
pertaining to plumbers, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) Every firm, person, or corporation that violates any of the
provisions of this chapter or the rules or orders issued or promulgated by
the State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board or that violates
any condition of a license, permit, certificate, or any other type of
registration issued by the committee board may be assessed a civil penalty by
the committee board.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 17-38-102(e), concerning fines collected
for plumbing violations, is amended to read as follows:
(e) All fines collected under this section shall be deposited into the
State Treasury and credited to the Plumbers Licensing Fund Code Enforcement
Licensing Board Fund to be used to defray the costs of administering this
chapter and as otherwise provided by law.
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493

SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 17-38-103(a), concerning the scope of the
state plumbing code, is amended to read as follows:
(a) After adoption according to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure
Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., the provisions of the state plumbing code or
amendments to the state plumbing code as adopted by the State Board of Health
Code Enforcement Licensing Board defining plumbing work and prescribing
minimum requirements for design, materials, appliances, workmanship, and
methods of installation shall have the effect and force of law in the form of
minimum standards statewide in application. The provisions shall apply to all
types of buildings, private or public, rural or urban, including buildings
owned by the state or any political subdivision of the state.

SECTION 48. Arkansas Code § 17-38-104(a)(1), concerning inspections by
the state in cities with enforcement officers pertaining to plumbing, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Department of Health Department of Labor and Licensing
inspectors may go into any city that has a city code enforcement officer and
assist the city code enforcement officer for the purpose of ensuring that the
minimum standards of the state plumbing code and plumber licensing rules are
being met.

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 17-38-105(4)(B), concerning exceptions
under the laws pertaining to plumbing, is amended to read as follows:
(B) This exemption applies to any existing or future plumbing
codes or rules promulgated by the State Board of Health Code Enforcement
Licensing Board, or its successor agency.

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 17-38-201 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-201. Powers and duties generally – Definition.
(a) The State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board shall
have the following powers:
(1) To ensure that the construction, installation, and
maintenance of plumbing in connection with all buildings in this state,
including buildings owned by the state or any political subdivision thereof,
shall be safe and sanitary in order to safeguard the public health;
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(2)(A) To have general supervision of all plumbing and,
according to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.,
shall prescribe and publish and enforce minimum reasonable standards that
shall be uniform as far as practicable.
(B) The Secretary of the Department of Health Department
of Labor and Licensing or any employee of the Department of Health Department
of Labor and Licensing designated by the State Board of Health department may
act for the State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board except in
adoption of rules;
(3) To prescribe rules as to the qualifications, examination,
and licensing of master plumbers and journeyman plumbers and for the
registration of apprentice plumbers;
(4) To assign the duties of the Committee of Plumbing Examiners;
(5)(A) (4)(A) To prescribe rules as to the use of corrugated
stainless steel piping.
(B) Such rules shall be no more stringent than the
American National Standards for Interior Fuel Gas Piping Systems; and
(6)(A) (5)(A) To require that a survey and inspection for leaks,
proper venting, and general condition of the natural gas piping system and
gas utilization equipment connected thereto, including appliances, serving
any school accredited by the State Board of Education shall be performed as
frequently as necessary, but at intervals not exceeding one (1) year. School
officials shall be responsible to ensure that these surveys and inspections
are performed by a qualified agency and that proof of the survey results are
provided to the Division of Protective Health Codes of the Department of
Health department by September 1 each year.
(B) As used in subdivision (a)(6)(A) (a)(5)(A) of this
section, “qualified agency” means any individual, firm, corporation, or
company which either in person or through a representative is engaged in and
is responsible for the installation, replacement, or repair of consumer gas
piping, or the connection, installation, repair, or servicing of gas
utilization equipment, and is experienced in such work and familiar with all
precautions required and has complied with all requirements of the State
Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board and the department and the
codes and rules.
(b) The State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board shall
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
prescribe rules governing plumbing apprentice training committees and, in
cooperation with educational authorities, assist in related training programs
for plumbers.
(c) The department may exercise such powers as are reasonably
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Among other things, it
may:
(1) Employ competent supervisors who shall be licensed plumbers
or licensed engineers, employ other assistants, and prescribe qualifications
and assign duties for the supervisors and assistants;
(2) Conduct investigations and experiments for the advancement
of technical knowledge relating to plumbing and hold public meetings and
attend or be represented at the meetings within or without the state;
(3) Enter and inspect at reasonable hours plumbing installations
on private or public property and disseminate information relative to the
provisions of this chapter;
(4) Prepare and cause to be printed such codes, bulletins, or
other documents as may be necessary and furnish copies thereof to those
engaged in the plumbing business and to the public upon request;
(5) Charge a reasonable fee for plumbing inspections;
(6) Furnish upon request of the owner of the building or of the
plumber making the plumbing installation, recommendations, or a certificate
of inspection;
(7) Issue restricted licenses limited to gas fitter, residential
and governmental maintenance, service line installation, solar mechanic, and
hospital maintenance licenses if the licensee has demonstrated competency for
the particular phase of plumbing for which the person is licensed and if the
State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board has adopted rules
defining restrictions in the type of work allowed, geographical area served,
and term of the type of restricted license; and
(8) Prepare a list giving the names and addresses of all
licensed plumbers and registered apprentice plumbers.
(d)(1) The State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board
shall prescribe rules as to the qualifications, examination, and licensing of
master plumbers and journeyman plumbers and for the registration of plumbing
apprentices.
(2) The State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
shall publish a list giving the names and addresses of all licensed plumbers,
registered plumbers, and city plumbing inspectors.
(e) The State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board may
issue special licenses and restricted licenses, including, but not limited
to, gas licenses and other licenses which may cover a special phase of
plumbing, provided that the licensee has demonstrated competency for the
particular phase of plumbing for which the person is licensed.
(f) The department shall issue a restricted gas utility license to all
gas utilities having gas servicepersons. The license shall cover all of the
servicepersons of the utility if the utility requires each serviceperson to
be specially trained for this service. The utility shall be responsible to
the department for each serviceperson and shall provide an identification
card showing the utility name, utility license number, and the restricted
service of the serviceperson. The utility shall register each serviceperson
and his or her serial number with the department.
(g) The State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board shall
allow the use of a harvested rainwater system used for a nonpotable purpose
if the harvested rainwater system:
(1) Is designed by a professional engineer licensed in Arkansas;
(2) Is designed with appropriate cross-connection safeguards; and
(3) Complies with the state plumbing code.
(h) The department and the State Board of Health shall:
(1) Accept plumbing plan review documents via email, via mail,
or in person; and
(2) Respond to an individual or entity submitting plumbing plan
review documents via email, unless the individual or entity indicates that
the individual or entity would prefer to receive the response via mail.

SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 17-38-202 is repealed.
17-38-202. Committee of Plumbing Examiners.
(a)(1) The State Board of Health shall appoint a Committee of Plumbing
Examiners consisting of seven (7) voting members, prescribe their
qualifications, and assign their duties.
(2) Qualifications of the members of the committee shall be as
follows:
(A) Two (2) of the members shall be master plumbers;
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(B) One (1) shall be a journeyman plumber;
(C) One (1) shall be a professional engineer as defined in
§ 17-30-101 with special expertise in plumbing design;
(D) Two (2) shall be consumers; and
(E) One (1) shall be a representative of the Department of
Health.
(b) The member from the department shall serve on the committee until
replaced by the Secretary of the Department of Health.
(c) The term of office for the remaining members shall be for a
staggered term of four (4) years. The board may remove a member for cause.
(d) When so directed, the committee and other employees of the
department shall serve the board in an advisory capacity in the formulating
of rules to be adopted by the board.
(e) Those members of the committee who are not employees of the State
of Arkansas may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with
§ 25-16-901 et seq.
(f) The Director of the Plumbing and Natural Gas Section of the
Department of Health shall serve as executive secretary for the committee.

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code § 17-38-203(a), concerning the regulation of
training plumbers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board shall
prescribe rules governing plumbing apprentice training committees and, in
cooperation with educational authorities, assist in related training programs
for plumbers.

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 17-38-204(a), concerning local regulatory
authority concerning plumbing, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A city, town, or county having a system of either water, sewerage,
or gas utility, or a combination of utilities, by ordinance, rules,
regulations, or customer contact shall prescribe rules and regulations
governing plumbing not in conflict with and equal to or exceeding the minimum
standards prescribed by the Department of Health Department of Labor and
Licensing.

SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 17-38-204(f)(2), concerning rules for
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
local plumbing inspection programs, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The State Board of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board
shall prescribe full rules including permits, permit fees, and inspections.

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 17-38-204(h), concerning local plumbing
plans, is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) If a city, town, sewerage district, water district, sewer
association, water association, utility gas system, or county enacts an
ordinance or regulation to provide for plan reviews of plumbing plans, the
city, town, sewerage district, water district, sewer association, water
association, utility gas system, or county may have an employee who is
certified as a plumbing and natural gas inspector perform plan reviews of
plumbing plans.
(2)(A)(i) All plumbing plans approved under subdivision (h)(1)
of this section shall not be required to be:
(a) Submitted with a payment of a fee to the
department Department of Health if a fee is submitted to the city, town,
sewerage district, water district, sewer association, water association,
utility gas system, or county; or
(b) Reviewed by the department Department of
Health if an engineer licensed in this state has prepared the plumbing plan
and the employee described under subdivision (h)(1) of this section is a
licensed engineer in this state.
(ii) However, a city, town, sewerage district, water
district, sewer association, water association, utility gas system, or county
may submit a plumbing plan to the department Department of Health for an
advisory opinion.
(B) The department Department of Health shall not require
the city, town, sewerage district, water district, sewer association, water
association, utility gas system, or county to relinquish or surrender a fee
submitted to the city, town, sewerage district, water district, sewer
association, water association, utility gas system, or county.
(C) The maximum allowable fee for a plan review under
subdivision (h)(1) of this section shall not exceed the fees set out in § 20-
7-123(b)(2).
(3)(A) A n employee who performs a plan review under subdivision
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(h)(1) of this section has the responsibility to ensure that the plumbing
plan meets state requirements.
(B) The department Department of Health may audit or
inspect the records of an employee who performs a plan review under
subdivision (h)(1) of this section.
(4) This section does not:
(A) Create a cause of action against a city, town,
sewerage district, water district, sewer association, water association,
utility gas system, or county for any resulting damages or failures of the
plumbing plan; or
(B) Prohibit a person from seeking a plan review from and
paying a fee to the department Department of Health in lieu of seeking a plan
review from and paying a fee to a city, town, sewerage district, water
district, sewer association, water association, utility gas system, or
county.
(5) A plumbing plan review under this section includes a review
of the plumbing as defined in § 17-38-101 and the water supply, water lines,
and sewage line designs.

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 17-38-205 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-205. Disposition of funds – Loans.
(a)(1) All fees or payments of any type collected by the State Board
of Health solely for performing plan review functions and duties under this
chapter shall be deposited into the State Treasury on or before the fifth day
of the month next following the month of collection thereof, and the
Treasurer of State shall credit the fees or deposits to the credit of the
“Plumbers Licensing Fund” “Department of Health Plan Review Fund”, which is
hereby created under § 19-6-417.
(b)(2) All funds deposited into the Plumbers Licensing Fund Plan
Review Fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of
the plumbers licensing and inspection services of the board.
(c)(3) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is authorized, from
time to time, to make transfers of moneys in the Budget Stabilization Trust
Fund as loans to the Plumbers Licensing Fund Department of Health Plan Review
Fund to be used for maintenance and operation of the plumbers licensing and
plumbing inspection program of the Department of Health. Any moneys loaned
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the Plumbers Licensing Fund
Department of Health Plan Review Fund shall be repaid from fees derived from
the plumbers licensing and plumbing inspection program on or before the last
day of the fiscal year in which the loan of the funds is made.
(d)(4) All moneys received from the sale or trade of motor
vehicles purchased with funds from the former Plumbers Licensing Fund shall
be credited to the Plumbers Licensing Fund Code Enforcement Licensing Board
Fund.
(b) All fees or payments of any type collected for plumbing licenses,
permit fees, inspections, fines, or penalties under this chapter shall be
deposited as special revenues into the State Treasury to the credit of the
Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund.

SECTION 57. Arkansas Code § 17-38-301(a)(1), concerning licensing
requirements for plumbers, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) No person shall engage in work as a master plumber, journeyman
plumber, apprentice plumber, or restricted license holder called for under
this chapter or adopted rules unless first licensed or registered to do so by
the Department of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board.

SECTION 58. Arkansas Code § 17-38-302(4), concerning exemptions to the
law concerning plumbers, is amended to read as follows:
(4) An individual certifying or repairing backflow devices
within the scope of a plumbing system if the individual holds a certificate
of competency from the Plumbing and Natural Gas Section of the Department of
Health Arkansas Rural Water Association; or

SECTION 59. Arkansas Code § 17-38-303 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-303. Temporary permits.
(a) The Committee of Plumbing Examiners of the State Board of Health
Code Enforcement Licensing Board may issue temporary revocable permits to
master plumber and journeyman plumber license applicants pending examination.
(b) The State Board of Health board shall make rules and prescribe
procedures governing the issuance of the permits.

SECTION 60. Arkansas Code § 17-38-304 is amended to read as follows:
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
17-38-304. Master plumber or journeyman plumber – Application.
(a) Application for a master plumber or journeyman plumber
examination, temporary permit, or license shall be made to the Department of
Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board with fees.
(b) No license or permit shall be transferable.
(c) Unless the applicant is entitled to a renewal of license, a
license shall be issued only after the applicant passes a satisfactory
examination showing fitness.
(d)(1) An applicant for the master plumber examination shall have a
minimum of five (5) years of plumbing experience.
(2) An applicant for the journeyman plumber examination shall
have a minimum of four (4) years of plumbing experience.
(e) The Committee of Plumbing Examiners board shall approve an
applicant for master plumber or journeyman plumber examination provided that
the applicant is currently licensed as a master plumber or journeyman plumber
in another state or political subdivision of that state whose plumbing laws
and codes are similar to those of this state.
(f) The committee board may approve an applicant for examination who
is not currently licensed in another state or its political subdivision or
who has no plumber licensing background, provided the applicant shows proof
of experience as a plumber in accordance with subsection (d) of this section.
The proof of experience may be in the form of records, affidavits, or bona
fide evidence from licensing agencies, former employers, or persons who can
attest to the applicant's work background as a plumber.
(g) The committee board may consider applicants for the master plumber
examination who are registered professional engineers with special expertise
in plumbing engineering.
(h) An individual applying for and obtaining a license as a journeyman
plumber shall be eligible for the master plumber examination after being
licensed as a journeyman plumber for one (1) year. In cases of extreme
hardship, the committee board may waive the one-year requirement in whole or
in part.
(i) The committee board shall consider an apprentice plumber for the
journeyman plumber examination, provided the apprentice plumber has
successfully completed the training as defined under the plumber
apprenticeship rules.
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493

SECTION 61. Arkansas Code § 17-38-305 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-305. Fees.
By rule and after public hearings, the State Board of Health Code
Enforcement Licensing Board may set reasonable license or examination fees
for all licenses called for under this chapter, including, but not limited
to, including without limitation master plumber licenses, journeyman plumber
licenses, apprentice plumber registration, gas utility licenses, and
restricted plumber licenses.

SECTION 62. Arkansas Code § 17-38-306 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-306. Examinations.
Regular examinations shall be held at least two (2) times a year, and
special examinations may be held at such time and place as may be fixed by
the Department of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board.

SECTION 63. Arkansas Code § 17-38-307 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-307. Notice of address change.
Every holder of a license shall promptly notify the State Board of
Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board of any change of his or her business
address.

SECTION 64. Arkansas Code § 17-38-308 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-308. Expiration and renewal.
(a) All licenses shall be renewed annually. within thirty (30) days
after the expiration date of the license. The Department of Health may renew
a license after the thirty-day period if there is sufficient reason for not
renewing the license in the time specified and after payment of penalties as
prescribed by rule.
(b) The department Code Enforcement Licensing Board may set a system
of staggered expiration dates for all licenses issued by the department
board.
(c) The department board may issue permits for less than one (1) year.
The cost of such permits shall be determined based upon the number of months
the permit is valid divided by twelve (12) months multiplied by the amount of
the annual permit fee.
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493

SECTION 65. Arkansas Code § 17-38-309 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-309. Grounds for suspension or revocation.
The Committee of Plumbing Examiners Code Enforcement Licensing Board,
on its own motion, may make investigations and conduct hearings and, on its
own motion or upon complaint in writing signed and verified by the
complainant and upon not less than ten (10) days' notice to the licensee, may
suspend any plumber's license or temporary permit if the committee board has
reason to believe, and may revoke the license or permit in the manner
provided in § 17-38-310 if it finds, that the holder of the license or permit
has:
(1) Made a material misstatement in the application for license
or renewal thereof or for temporary permit;
(2) Demonstrated incompetency to act as a license holder; or
(3) Willfully violated any provisions of this chapter or any
rule or order prescribed by the State Board of Health board.

SECTION 66. Arkansas Code § 17-38-310 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-310. Procedure for suspension or revocation.
(a) Suspensions, revocations, civil penalties, and all other such
actions regarding licensure, registration, permitting, certification, or
apprenticeship, and all appeals to the State Board of Health Code Enforcement
Licensing Board taken from such actions shall be conducted in accordance with
the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(b) Any member of the Committee of Plumbing Examiners of the State
Board of Health, a representative designated by the committee, any member of
the board, or a representative designated by the board shall have the
authority to administer oaths for the taking of testimony.
(c)(b) One (1) year after the date of revocation, an application may be
made for a new license.

SECTION 67. Arkansas Code § 17-38-311 is amended to read as follows:
17-38-311. Restricted lifetime master plumber license.
(a) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time thereafter,
any person who has been a licensed master plumber licensed by the Department
of Health Code Enforcement Licensing Board for not less than twelve (12)
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
years may apply for a restricted lifetime master plumber license. This
license shall be issued upon satisfactory proof of age and upon payment of a
fee prescribed by the department board.
(b) The department board shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.

SECTION 68. Arkansas Code § 17-38-402(2), concerning the powers of the
Career Education and Workforce Development Board, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) To adopt rules as to the qualifications, training, and
supervision of apprentice plumbers subject to the approval of the Department
of Health Department of Labor and Licensing; and

SECTION 69. Arkansas Code § 17-40-103(a)(13), concerning exemptions to
law pertaining to private investigators and private security agencies, is
amended to read as follows:
(13) Installation of fixed fire extinguisher systems by persons
licensed by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement
Licensing Board;

SECTION 70. Arkansas Code § 17-55-101 is amended to read as follows:
17-55-101. Licensure of electrical inspectors.
(a) A person employed as an electrical inspector in the State of
Arkansas shall hold an electrical inspector license issued by the Board of
Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing
Board.
(b)(1) A person shall apply for licensure as an electrical inspector
on a form approved by the board within thirty (30) days of employment as an
electrical inspector.
(2) Applications shall be made to the board and shall contain:
(A) Proof of employment with the state or a political
subdivision of the state as an electrical inspector in the State of Arkansas;
(B)(i) Verification of work experience as required by rule
of the board.
(ii) Work experience shall include without
limitation demonstrated knowledge of:
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(a) The standard materials and methods used in
the installation of electric equipment;
(b) Approved methods of construction to ensure
the safety of persons and property; and
(c) The requirements of the statewide
standards for the construction, installation, and maintenance of electrical
facilities and the performance of electrical work under § 20-31-104; and
(C) Payment of a license fee as established by rule of
the board that shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).
(c) An electrical inspector license:
(1) Shall expire on January 1 of each year; and
(2) May be renewed upon application to the board and submission
of the following information:
(A) Proof of continued employment as an electrical
inspector in the State of Arkansas;
(B) Payment of a renewal fee as established by rule of
the board that shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00); and
(C)(i) Proof of completion of at least sixteen (16) eight
(8) hours of continuing education.
(ii) The board shall promulgate rules to set
standards for continuing education for licensees under subdivision
(c)(2)(C)(i) of this section. The rules shall include without limitation
continuing education on the statewide standards for the construction,
installation, and maintenance of electrical facilities and the performance of
electrical work under § 20-31-104.
(iii) The Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing may
conduct or sponsor continuing education classes for electrical inspectors.
(d)(1) The board may revoke or suspend an electrical inspector's
license for just cause subject to appeal and hearing before
the board according to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-
201 et seq.
(2)(A) A civil penalty may be assessed against an electrical
inspector by the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing and
subject to appeal and hearing before the board according to the Arkansas
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., if it is determined that
the electrical inspector has violated a:
(i) Provision of this chapter;
(ii) Rule or order issued or promulgated by
the board; or
(iii) Condition of a license issued by the board,
including without limitation a licensee having a criminal record as
prohibited under § 17-3-102.
(B) For each violation, the civil penalty shall not exceed
the following: one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day.
(i) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first
offense;
(ii) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for a second
offense; or
(iii) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a third
offense.
(C) Each day of a continuing violation is a separate
violation for purposes of penalty assessment.
(D)(i) Assessment of a civil penalty by the board shall be
made no later than two (2) years after the date of the occurrence of the
violation.
(ii) A civil penalty shall not be assessed until the
person charged with the violation has been given the opportunity for a
hearing on the violation.
(E) If an electrical inspector against whom a civil
penalty has been imposed fails to pay the penalty within sixty (60) days of
the board's decision, the Director of the Division of Occupational and
Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Secretary of the Department of
Labor and Licensing or his or her designee may file an action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to collect the civil penalty without paying costs or
giving bond for costs.
(F) Any penalties collected under this section shall be
deposited as special revenues into the State Treasury to the credit of the
Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund. Department of Labor and Licensing
Special Fund, there to be used by the Department of Labor and Licensing in
carrying out the functions, powers, and duties of this chapter.
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(e) If a person simultaneously holds an electrical inspector license
and a license as a master electrician or a journeyman electrician, the
person, when renewing his or her master electrician or journeyman electrician
license, shall be exempt from the:
(1) Renewal fee under § 17-28-301; and
(2) Continuing education requirements for master electricians
and journeyman electricians under § 17-28-311.

SECTION 71. Arkansas Code § 17-55-103 is repealed.
17-55-103. Persons employed as electrical inspectors as of August 16,
2013.
(a) A person employed as an electrical inspector as of August 16,
2013, shall be issued a temporary electrical inspector license upon
submission of the following information to the Board of Electrical Examiners
of the State of Arkansas:
(1) Proof of employment with the state or a political
subdivision of the state as an electrical inspector in the State of Arkansas;
(2) Verification of work experience as required by rule of the
board; and
(3) Payment of a license fee as required by rule of the board.
(b)(1) A temporary license issued under this section shall expire on
January 1, 2014.
(2) A recipient of a temporary license shall be eligible to
apply for an electrical inspector license under this chapter.

SECTION 72. Arkansas Code § 17-55-104 is amended to read as follows:
17-55-104. Disposition of funds.
All funds received by the Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of
Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing Board under this chapter shall be
deposited as special revenues into the State Treasury to the credit of the
board. Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund, there to be used by
the Department of Labor and Licensing in carrying out the functions, powers,
and duties as set out in this chapter, § 17-28-101 et seq., and the Arkansas
Electrical Code Authority Act, § 20-31-101 et seq., and to defray the costs
of the maintenance, operation, and improvements required by the department in
carrying out the functions, powers, and duties otherwise imposed by law on
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing.

SECTION 73. Arkansas Code § 17-55-105(b), concerning fees for
continuing education requirements for electrical inspectors, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) Fees under subsection (a) of this section shall be established by
rule of the Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code
Enforcement Licensing Board.

SECTION 74. Arkansas Code § 17-55-106 is amended to read as follows:
17-55-106. Rules.
The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code
Enforcement Licensing Board may promulgate rules necessary to implement this
chapter.

SECTION 75. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1242 is repealed.
19-5-1242. Fire Protection Licensing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Fire Protection Licensing Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All funds provided by law for the fund; and
(2) Examination and renewal fees charged pursuant to § 20-22-
610.
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement as required by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as set out in § 20-22-601 et
seq.

SECTION 76. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(25), concerning special revenues
of the state, is amended to read as follows:
(25) Elevator safety board fees, as enacted by Acts 1963, No.
189, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 20-24-101 — 20-24-117, and 20-24-
119;

SECTION 77. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(72), concerning special revenues
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
of the state, is amended to read as follows:
(72) Board of electrical examiners Electrician examination,
license, and penalty fees, as enacted by Acts 1979, No. 870, § 17-28-101 et
seq., § 17-28-201 et seq., and § 17-28-301 et seq., and Acts 1981, No. 132,
and all laws amendatory thereto;

SECTION 78. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(160), concerning special revenues
of the state, is amended to read as follows:
(160) HVACR Licensing Board fees, § 17-33-204 All fees or
payments of any type collected concerning HVACR licensing, regulation, or
enforcement under § 17-33-201 et seq.;

SECTION 79. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301 is amended to add a new
subdivision to read as follows:
(277) All revenue collected in connection with the performance
of the powers, functions, and duties of the Code Enforcement Licensing Board
created under § 17-33-201, including without limitation revenue collected
from licensing, regulation, and the collection of any fine, fee, penalty,
setoff, judgment, or otherwise.

SECTION 80. Arkansas Code § 19-6-417 is amended to read as follows:
19-6-417. Department of Health Plumbers Licensing Fund Plan Review
Fund.
The Department of Health Plumbers Licensing Fund Plan Review Fund shall
consist of those special revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(64) collected
for plan review functions and duties under § 17-38-204, there to be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Plumbing Plan
Review Section of the Environmental Health Services Division of the
Department of Health in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as set
out in § 17-38-101 et seq., and for paying the expenses of administering such
funds as may be authorized by law.

SECTION 81. Arkansas Code § 19-6-469 is repealed.
19-6-469. HVACR Licensing Fund.
The HVACR Licensing Fund shall consist of those special revenues as
specified in § 19-6-301(160), there to be used for the maintenance,
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
operation, and improvement of the Heating, Ventilation, Air Conditioning, and
Refrigeration (HVACR) Licensing and Inspection program of the Department of
Health as set out in § 17-33-201 et seq.

SECTION 82. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 6, Subchapter 8, is
amended to add a new section to read as follows:
19-6-846. Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All revenue collected in connection with the performance of
the powers, functions, and duties of the Code Enforcement Licensing Board
created under § 17-33-201, including without limitation from licensing,
regulation, and the collection of any fine, fee, penalty, setoff, judgment,
or otherwise; and
(2) Any other revenue as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Labor and Licensing
to:
(1) Administer the board; and
(2) Perform any other function or duty of the department.

SECTION 83. Arkansas Code § 20-22-602(1), concerning definitions
pertaining to fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(1) “Apprentice” means a qualified person: who may perform work
entitled by the licensee under the direct supervision of a licensed employee;
(A) Enrolled as required in an apprenticeship program
recognized by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board; and
(B) Who may perform work entitled by the licensee under
the direct supervision of a licensed employee;

SECTION 84. Arkansas Code § 20-22-602(6)(B), concerning the definition
of "fixed fire protection systems" pertaining to fire extinguishers, is
amended to read as follows:
(B) Listed or approved fire protection systems or
suppression systems installed and maintained according to the standards
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
adopted in the rules of the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Code
Enforcement Licensing Board;

SECTION 85. Arkansas Code § 20-22-603(5)(B), concerning exceptions to
the law concerning fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(B) All work is performed according to the standards
adopted and the rules of the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Code
Enforcement Licensing Board and the National Fire Protection Association
pamphlet number ten (No. 10): Standard for Portable Fire Extinguishers;

SECTION 86. Arkansas Code § 20-22-604(a), concerning penalties
relating to fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement
Licensing Board, in a lawful proceeding respecting licensing as defined in
the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., in addition
to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action, may assess a civil
penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation of
any statute, rule, or order enforceable by the board.

SECTION 87. Arkansas Code § 20-22-605(a), concerning the report and
investigation of violations relating to fire extinguishers, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) The Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Boards and
Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing and other state and local
agencies and officers may cooperate with and assist the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board in administering
and enforcing this subchapter by reporting to the board any violations of
this subchapter or any failure to comply with this subchapter or the policies
adopted by the board pursuant to the authority granted in this subchapter.

SECTION 88. Arkansas Code § 20-22-606 is repealed.
20-22-606. Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board — Creation —
Members.
(a)(1) There is created the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board,
which shall be composed of eleven (11) members who are residents of the state
and who shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of five (5) years. The
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
eleven (11) members shall be constituted as follows:
(A) One (1) member shall be an industrial safety
representative;
(B) One (1) member shall be the State Fire Marshal;
(C) One (1) member shall be a representative of a state
association of fire chiefs;
(D) One (1) member shall be a representative of the fire
insurance industry;
(E) Two (2) members shall be representatives of large
industrial users of fire suppression equipment;
(F) One (1) member shall be a representative of a
restaurant association;
(G) Two (2) members shall be active in the installation
and servicing of portable fire extinguishers or fixed fire protection
systems; and
(H) Two (2) members shall be active in the installation
and servicing of fire protection sprinkler systems.
(2) Each of the four (4) congressional districts in the state
shall be represented by at least one (1) member.
(3) Each of the members shall be experienced and knowledgeable
in one (1) or more of the following areas:
(A) The installation or servicing of:
(i) Portable fire extinguishers;
(ii) Fixed fire protection systems; and
(iii) Fire protection sprinkler systems;
(B) The manufacturing of fire suppression equipment;
(C) The fire insurance industry;
(D) The use of fire suppression equipment by the food
service industry; or
(E) The provision of fire suppression services by a fire
department.
(b) Each member may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in
accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.
(c)(1) The board may expend moneys as necessary to reimburse the
Department of Labor and Licensing for stationery, office supplies,
application forms, equipment, and other materials necessary for the board to
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
carry out its duties.
(2) The expense reimbursement and stipends authorized by § 25-
16-901 et seq. and the expense for necessary office supplies, forms,
equipment, and other necessary materials shall be paid from the fees and
fines collected by the board.
(d)(1) The board shall employ an executive director, chief board
investigator, and other staff as necessary whose compensation shall be set by
the board.
(2) The staff shall be paid from fees and fines collected by the
board.

SECTION 89. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-22-607 is
amended to read as follows:
The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing
Board shall:

SECTION 90. Arkansas Code § 20-22-608 is amended to read as follows:
20-22-608. State Fire Marshal — Powers and duties.
The State Fire Marshal shall advise and assist the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board in the adoption
of policies and procedures for the:
(1) Effective monitoring of the sale, installation, and
servicing of portable fire extinguishers;
(2) Sale, installation, and servicing of fixed fire protection
systems;
(3) Design, installation, inspection, servicing, and maintenance
of fire protection sprinkler systems, including standpipe and hose systems;
and
(4) Registration and licensing of firms and individuals
providing these goods and services.

SECTION 91. Arkansas Code § 20-22-609(8), concerning penalties related
to fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(8) Engage in any business or activity licensed or permitted by
the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board
without maintaining in force at all times a public liability insurance
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
policy, with minimum coverage limits as set by the board, covering the
person's operations and completed operations.

SECTION 92. Arkansas Code § 20-22-610(a), concerning applications for
a license, permit, or certificate relating to fire extinguishers, is amended
to read as follows:
(a) Applications for licenses, permits, and certificates provided for
in this section shall be made under policies adopted by the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board and shall be
submitted on forms prescribed by the board.

SECTION 93. Arkansas Code § 20-22-610(b)(6)(D), concerning apprentice
permits relating to fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(D)(i) A copy of the application or the apprentice permit
is valid for one (1) year from the date of issue and is not renewable. The
fire protection sprinkler system apprentice permit is valid for one (1) year
from the date of issue.
(ii) The portable fire extinguishers and fixed fire
protection systems apprentice permit is valid for one (1) year from the date
of issue and is not renewable.

SECTION 94. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-22-611(a),
concerning qualifications for a license, permit, or certificate related to
fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) For a license to install or service portable fire extinguishers,
for a license to sell, install, or service fixed fire protection systems, or
for a license to conduct any fire protection sprinkler system business, a
person employed by a certified firm shall obtain a license issued by the
Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board
after:

SECTION 95. Arkansas Code § 20-22-612 is repealed.
20-22-612. License, permit, or certificate — Previously engaged
persons.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, if any person or
firm engaged in the business on January 1, 1977, of servicing portable fire
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
extinguishers, installing or servicing fixed fire protection systems, or
performing hydrostatic testing of fire extinguishers derived twenty-five
percent (25%) or more of the personal or firm income from servicing portable
fire extinguishers or installing or servicing fixed fire protection systems
or hydrostatic testing of fire extinguishers during the 1976 calendar year,
the person or firm shall be registered or issued a license to continue in the
business upon payment of the annual registration or license fee prescribed in
this subchapter for the particular type of business, if the applicant's
qualifications meet those requirements established by the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board.

SECTION 96. Arkansas Code § 20-22-613(a), concerning fire extinguisher
approval from testing laboratories, is amended to read as follows:
(a) No portable fire extinguisher or fixed fire protection system may
be sold or installed in this state unless it carries a label of approval of a
nationally recognized testing laboratory approved by the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board.

SECTION 97. Arkansas Code § 20-23-101(3), concerning definitions
pertaining to boiler safety, is amended to read as follows:
(3) “Internal” and “external” inspection means a thorough and
proper inspection as provided for in the rules by the Boiler Inspection
Division Section;

SECTION 98. Arkansas Code § 20-23-101, concerning definitions
pertaining to boiler safety, is amended to add a new subdivision to read as
follows:
(7) “Boiler Inspection Section” means a unit of the Code
Enforcement Licensing Board devoted to the administration of this chapter
under the direction of the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing
or his or her designee.

SECTION 99. Arkansas Code § 20-23-103 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-103. Enforcement.
(a) The criminal penalties provided by this chapter shall be enforced
by the prosecuting attorney of each judicial district. The administrative
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
penalties provided by this chapter shall be imposed pursuant to rules of the
Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee.
(b) The director secretary or his or her designee may collect an
administrative penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter in a civil action in
a court of competent jurisdiction, and he or she shall not be required to pay
costs or to enter a bond for payment of costs.

SECTION 100. Arkansas Code § 20-23-104 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-104. Periodic or regular attendance.
(a) All boilers subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be
continuously monitored by mechanical and electronic devices approved by the
Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee. When a plant is in operation or when any
public building is occupied, the boilers shall be under regular attendance by
a boiler operator unless otherwise exempt.
(b) Boilers that are manually operated shall be under constant
attendance whenever they are in use for any purpose.
(c) All steam boilers fifty horsepower (50 hp) and over, as rated by
the manufacturer in any location, and steam boilers used in hospitals,
hotels, schools, theatres, and office buildings, but not limited to these
places, shall be under regular attendance by a licensed operator who holds a
certificate of competency issued by the Boiler Inspection Division Section.

SECTION 101. Arkansas Code § 20-23-105 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-105. Disposition of funds.
(a) All money received under this chapter shall be paid to the
Treasurer of State, who shall place this money to the credit of the
Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund, there to be used by the
Department of Labor and Licensing in carrying out the functions, powers, and
duties as set out in this chapter and to defray the costs of the maintenance,
operation, and improvements required by the department in carrying out the
functions, powers, and duties otherwise imposed by law on the department or
the Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor
and Licensing or his or her designee.
(b) The director may issue vouchers for salaries and expenses of the
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
Boiler Inspection Division when proper appropriation has been made for the
expenditures.

SECTION 102. Arkansas Code § 20-23-202 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-202. Chief inspector, deputy inspector, etc.
(a)(1) When the office of Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection
Division Section becomes vacant, the Director of the Division of Labor
Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee
shall employ a citizen of the State of Arkansas to be chief inspector.
(2) The chief inspector shall have at the time of employment not
less than ten (10) five (5) years' experience in the construction,
maintenance, installation, and repair or inspection of high pressure boilers
and unfired pressure vessels.
(b)(1)(A) The director secretary or his or her designee is authorized
and empowered to employ a technical assistant and deputy inspectors of
boilers.
(B) Inspectors of steam boilers and unfired pressure
vessels shall have had at the time of employment not less than five (5) three
(3) years' experience in the construction, maintenance, installation, and
repair of high pressure boilers and unfired pressure vessels or possess a
currently valid commission from the National Board of Boiler and Pressure
Vessel Inspectors.
(C)(i) Inspectors of steam boilers and unfired pressure
vessels also shall have passed a written examination.
(ii) The examination shall conform to standards not
exceeding those prescribed by the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code of the
American Society of Mechanical Engineers.
(iii) The examination shall test the inspector's
knowledge of the construction, installation, maintenance, and repair of
boilers and their appurtenances.
(2) The director secretary or his or her designee is also
empowered to employ clerical and administrative employees, as well as other
inspectors, as necessary to perform the work of the Boiler Inspection
Division Section.
(3) The salaries are to be approved by the General Assembly.
(c) The salaries of the employees of the Boiler Inspection Division
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
Section, together with the necessary expenses of the Boiler Inspection
Division Section, shall be paid out of the fees for which provision is made
in this chapter.

SECTION 103. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-23-
203(a), concerning the duties of the Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection
Division, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection Division Section,
either personally or by a deputy inspector, shall carefully:

SECTION 104. Arkansas Code § 20-23-203(c), concerning the duties of the
Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection Division, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) The chief inspector shall enforce the laws of the state
governing the use of boilers and unfired pressure vessels. He or she shall
examine into and report to Director of the Division of Labor the Secretary of
the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee the causes of
boiler explosions which occur within the state.
(2) He or she shall keep in his or her office a complete and
accurate record of the names of all owners or operators of boilers inspected
by the Boiler Inspection Division Section, together with the location, make,
type, dimensions, age, condition, pressure allowed upon, and date of the last
inspection of all boilers and shall make an annual report thereon to the
director secretary or his or her designee.

SECTION 105. Arkansas Code § 20-23-301 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-301. Certificate of inspection required – Application of rules
and standards – Penalties.
(a)(1) No owner or user of a boiler or pressure vessel or engineer or
fireman in charge of a boiler or pressure vessel shall operate or allow the
boiler or pressure vessel to be operated without a certificate of inspection
issued by the Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department
of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee or shall allow a greater
pressure in the boiler or pressure vessel than is allowed by the certificate
of inspection.
(2)(A) All boilers and pressure vessels installed or in
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
operation in this state shall conform to those rules and standards that shall
from time to time be adopted by the Boiler Inspection Division Section with
the approval of the director secretary or his or her designee.
(B) The rules and standards shall not exceed those set out
in the several sections of the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code of the
American Society of Mechanical Engineers and shall have the force of law
immediately upon their approval by the director secretary or his or her
designee.
(3) No person shall operate or cause to be operated any boiler
or unfired pressure vessel on which the certificate of inspection has been
suspended or the operation of which has been forbidden by an inspector as
provided in §§ 20-23-203, 20-23-306, 20-23-310, 20-23-401, and 20-23-402.
(4) All pressure piping installed in this state shall conform to
those rules and standards that shall from time to time be adopted by the
Boiler Inspection Division Section with the approval of the director
secretary or his or her designee. The rules and standards shall not exceed
those set out in the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Code for
Pressure Piping, Power Piping Code, B31.1.
(b) Any person violating this section shall be subject to an
administrative fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

SECTION 106. Arkansas Code § 20-23-302 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-302. Report by manufacturer, owner, and user.
(a) Every manufacturer, owner, or user of a boiler or unfired pressure
vessel in use or to be used in any part of the state and subject to
inspection by the Boiler Inspection Division Section, as provided by this
chapter, shall report to the division Boiler Inspection Section the location
of the boiler or unfired pressure vessel at such times and in such manner and
form as may be determined by the rules of the division Boiler Inspection
Section.
(b) Any owner, user, or agent of the owner of any boiler or unfired
pressure vessel subject to inspection by the division Boiler Inspection
Section, as provided in this chapter, who shall fail to report its location
to the division Boiler Inspection Section shall be subject to an
administrative fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100).
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493

SECTION 107. Arkansas Code § 20-23-304 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-304. Failure to make ready for inspection.
Any owner, user, or agent of the owner of any boiler subject to
inspection by the Boiler Inspection Division Section who shall fail to have a
boiler ready for inspection after due notice as provided in this chapter
shall pay to the division Boiler Inspection Section the inspection fee
provided by this subchapter and shall be subject to an administrative fine of
any sum not less than ten dollars ($10.00).

SECTION 108. Arkansas Code § 20-23-305 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-305. Special inspection.
(a) If at any time the owner, user, or agent of the owner of any
boiler within the state shall desire a special inspection of any boiler, it
shall be made by the Boiler Inspection Division Section after due request
thereof.
(b) The inspector making the inspection shall collect a fee of one
hundred dollars ($100) for each boiler together with his or her expenses from
Little Rock to the place of inspection and return.

SECTION 109. Arkansas Code § 20-23-306 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-306. Issuance.
(a)(1) Upon receipt by the Boiler Inspection Division Section of an
annual or biennial certificate report of inspection from a state inspector or
from an inspector employed by an insurance company that a boiler or pressure
vessel is in safe working condition with the required fittings, valves, and
appliances properly installed and set, the Director of the Division of Labor
Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee
shall issue to the owner of the boiler or pressure vessel a certificate of
inspection.
(2) The certificate of inspection shall be issued upon payment
of a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) in cases of all boilers other than
unfired pressure vessels and a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) in cases of
unfired pressure vessels.
(3) The certificate of inspection shall state the maximum
pressure at which the boiler or pressure vessel may be operated as may be
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
determined by the rules adopted by the Boiler Inspection Division Section, as
provided in this chapter.
(b) Upon receipt of a certificate of inspection under subsection (a)
of this section, unless the certificate of inspection is withdrawn or
suspended, the owner or user may operate boilers:
(1) Other than unfired pressure vessels described in the
certificate for one (1) year from the date of annual inspection plus any
extension granted under § 20-23-203(a) of the time for the next annual
inspection; and
(2) That are unfired pressure vessels for two (2) years from the
date of biennial inspection.
(c) Any owner or operator of a boiler or pressure vessel who is
dissatisfied with the result of an inspection made by an inspector employed
by an insurance company may appeal to the Chief Inspector of the Boiler
Inspection Division Section, who shall cause a special investigation to be
conducted and, upon the report of the inspection, shall render his or her
decision, the decision to be final.

SECTION 110. Arkansas Code § 20-23-307 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-307. New boilers and unfired pressure vessels – Permit required.
(a) Every manufacturer, contractor, jobber, owner, or user of a boiler
or unfired pressure vessel or pressure piping system shall obtain a permit
from the Boiler Inspection Division Section before any boiler or unfired
pressure vessel or pressure piping system may be installed or moved and
installed in the State of Arkansas.
(b) When new boilers or unfired pressure vessels are to be installed,
the manufacturer's data report for each boiler and unfired pressure vessel
shall be submitted with the application for installation.
(c) No boiler or unfired pressure vessel or pressure piping may be
installed without approval from the division Boiler Inspection Section.

SECTION 111. Arkansas Code § 20-23-308 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-308. New boilers and unfired pressure vessels – Fees.
(a) The following fees shall be paid before permits may be issued for
the installation of any boiler or unfired pressure vessel:
(1) Boilers:
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(A) Up to 25 200 horsepower, incl. $15.00 $25.00
(B) Over 25 horsepower to 50 horsepower, incl. 20.00
(C) Over 50 horsepower to 100 horsepower, incl. 25.00
(D) Over 100 horsepower to 200 horsepower, incl. 30.00
(E) Over 200 horsepower to 300 horsepower, incl. 50.00
(F) Over 300 horsepower to 400 horsepower, incl. 60.00
(G) Over 400 horsepower to 500 horsepower, incl. 70.00
(H) Over 500 200 horsepower $95.00 $45.00
(2) Unfired pressure vessels, including hot water storage
containers: $30.00
(A) 500 gallons capacity or less $15.00
(B) 501 gallons capacity to 1,000 gallons capacity 20.00
(C) 1,001 gallons capacity to 5,000 gallons capacity 40.00
(D) 5,001 gallons capacity and over 50.00
(b) The fee paid for the issuance of a permit for the installation of
pressure piping shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

SECTION 112. Arkansas Code § 20-23-310 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-310. Suspension.
(a)(1) The Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection Division Section
or his or her authorized representatives representative may at any time
suspend an inspection certificate when in their his or her opinion the boiler
or unfired pressure vessel for which it was issued cannot be operated without
menace to the public safety or when the boiler or unfired pressure vessel is
found not to comply with the rules provided in this subchapter.
(2) Any insurance company inspector or inspection service
provider who has been issued an Arkansas commission and is inspecting boilers
or pressure vessels in this state shall have corresponding powers with
respect to operating certificates for boilers or pressure vessels insured by
the company employing him or her.
(3) The suspension of an operating certificate shall continue in
effect until the boiler or pressure vessel shall have been made to conform to
the rules of the Boiler Inspection Division Section and until the operating
certificate shall have been reinstated.
(b) Any inspector of the division Boiler Inspection Section or any
commissioned inspector of any insurance company or inspection service
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
provider who after inspection of a boiler or unfired pressure vessel shall
find it unsafe for operation shall suspend its certificate of inspection and
forbid its further use until it shall have been made to conform to the
standards adopted by the division Boiler Inspection Section and until its
certificate of inspection shall have been reinstated by an authorized
inspector.

SECTION 113. Arkansas Code § 20-23-311 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-311. Inspection fees generally.
(a) Within thirty (30) days from the date of inspection, there shall
be paid for the annual inspection of each boiler by the Boiler Inspection
Division Section made according to the provisions of this chapter, the sum as
follows:
(1) Boilers: $25.00; and
(A) Up to and including 15 horsepower, incl. $10.00
(B) Over 15 horsepower to 50 horsepower, incl. 13.00
(C) Over 50 horsepower to 100 horsepower, incl. 18.00
(D) Over 100 horsepower to 150 horsepower, incl. 20.00
(E) Over 150 horsepower to 250 horsepower, incl. 23.00
(F) Over 250 horsepower to 500 horsepower, incl. 35.00
(G) Over 500 horsepower 50.00
(2) Shop inspections: per day, four hundred forty dollars
($440); per half day, two hundred and twenty dollars ($220); plus expenses,
including mileage not to exceed the rate authorized by the General Assembly
to employees of state agencies who furnish their own transportation, and
meals and lodging in accordance with that approved by the General Assembly as
a daily allowance; and
(3) Unfired pressure vessels: $15.00
(A) 150 gallons or less $9.00
(B) 151 gallons to 500 gallons 10.00
(C) 501 gallons to 1,000 gallons 11.00
(D) 1,001 gallons to 2,000 gallons 12.00
(E) 2,001 gallons to 3,000 gallons 13.00
(F) 3,001 gallons to 5,000 gallons 14.00
(G) 5,001 gallons and over 18.00
(b) The rates in subsection (a) of this section may be reduced by the
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee at the beginning of any fiscal year if the
rates produce a greater amount of revenue than is required to defray the cost
of operation of the Boiler Inspection Division Section.
(c) All inspection fees shall be paid by the owner, user, or agent of
the owner, and the inspector may receive the fee and issue his or her receipt
therefor.
(d) If the owner, user, or agent of the owner shall fail to pay any
inspection fee under this section within thirty (30) days, a civil money
penalty equal to the amount of the unpaid fee shall attach to the outstanding
amount of the fee, and the director secretary or his or her designee shall be
empowered to collect this penalty in addition to the amount of the fee.

SECTION 114. Arkansas Code § 20-23-312 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-312. Inspection fees – Collection.
(a)(1) In addition to other remedies provided for by this chapter, if
after the making of any inspection or accrual of any charge or penalty
required or authorized by this chapter, the fee, penalty, or charge is not
paid within thirty (30) days after demand upon whoever is liable therefor,
the Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor
and Licensing or his or her designee may employ an attorney, who is empowered
without payment of costs or giving of bond for costs to institute suit in the
name of the State of Arkansas in any court of competent jurisdiction to
collect the fees, penalties, costs, and charges.
(2)(A) The court where suit is brought pursuant to subdivision
(a)(1) of this section for collection of fees, penalties, and charges shall,
without limitation, based on the actual amount of the judgment award an
attorney's fee equal to the actual cost to the Division of Labor Department
of Labor and Licensing or the Boiler Inspection Division Section for the
regular hourly rate of pay of the attorney multiplied by the actual hours,
including, but not limited to, travel time, litigation, and case review.
(B) Furthermore, the court shall award, without
limitation, based on the actual amount of the judgment an amount equal to all
costs incurred by the Division of Labor department or the Boiler Inspection
Division Section, including, but not limited to, travel costs, witness fees,
sheriff's service fees, or costs incurred pursuant to the collection of any
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
judgment obtained by the Division of Labor department or the Boiler
Inspection Division Section.
(b)(1) The plaintiff in the suits is given a lien upon the boiler and
all parts, connections, and attachments thereto, whether attached to the land
or not, to accrue the payment of the inspection fees for making the
inspection.
(2) The lien shall attach to the property at the time of making
the inspection and shall continue until all inspection fees are paid.
(3) The lien, when it so attaches, shall be held to be prior,
paramount, and superior to the liens, claims, and demands of all persons
whomsoever, whether owners, agents, mortgagees, trustees, and beneficiaries
under trusts or owners whether prior in time or not.

SECTION 115. Arkansas Code § 20-23-314 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-314. Pressure piping inspections.
(a) The installation of pressure piping shall be periodically
inspected during the course of the installation by an inspector commissioned
pursuant to the provisions of § 20-23-401 in the manner and with the
frequency prescribed by the rules of the Boiler Inspection Division Section.
(b)(1) Upon completion of the installation of any pressure piping, a
final inspection shall be made, and the inspector shall complete a final
inspection report on a form approved by the Director of the Division of Labor
Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee.
(2) A copy of the final inspection report shall be filed with
the Boiler Inspection Division Section within thirty (30) days of completion
of the installation.
(c) If the report required by subsection (b) of this section is not
filed within thirty (30) days after completion of the installation, the
Boiler Inspection Division Section shall designate an inspector in its employ
to make the inspection and report required by subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The inspections and reports required by subsections (a) and (b) of
this section may be made by an inspector in the employ of the Boiler
Inspection Division Section.
(e) For each inspection made by an inspector employed by the Boiler
Inspection Division Section and required by subsection (a), subsection (b),
or subsection (c) of this section, the holder of the installation permit
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
shall pay the Boiler Inspection Division Section an inspection fee in the
amount of four hundred forty dollars ($440) per day or two hundred twenty
dollars ($220) per half-day, plus expenses and mileage at the rates
authorized for employees of the Division of Labor who furnish their own
transportation.
(f) The inspections required by this section and the installation
permit required for pressure piping by § 20-23-307 shall apply only to new
installations and shall not be construed as requiring an inspection or an
installation permit for maintenance, repair, or renovation of existing
facilities.

SECTION 116. Arkansas Code § 20-23-401(a), concerning certificates of
competency and commissions of inspectors of the Boiler Inspection Division,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) Certificates of competency and commissions as inspectors of
boilers shall be issued by the Boiler Inspection Division Section to persons
in the employ of any company authorized to insure boilers against explosions
in this state or by a qualified inspection service provider.

SECTION 117. Arkansas Code § 20-23-401(f)(1), concerning commissions
issued relating to boiler safety, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) Any commission issued under this subchapter shall be
immediately returned to the division Boiler Inspection Section when the
inspector to whom it has been issued shall cease to be employed by the
insurance company or inspection service provider employing him or her at the
time the commission was issued.

SECTION 118. Arkansas Code § 20-23-402 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-402. Inspectors employed by insurance or private inspection
service providers companies.
(a) Boiler inspectors employed by insurance companies or private
inspection service providers which are authorized to insure boilers in this
state shall hold certificates of competency issued by the Boiler Inspection
Division Section as provided in this section and shall:
(1) Inspect internally and externally at least one (1) time
annually or within the time granted under § 20-23-203(a) all high pressure
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
steam boilers insured by their respective companies;
(2) Inspect externally one (1) time annually and internally one
(1) time every three (3) years every low pressure steam heating boiler
insured by their respective companies; and
(3) Inspect unfired pressure vessels biennially.
(b) The insured boilers shall be exempt from all inspections other
than those of the respective insurance company inspectors unless there is
some evidence that proper inspection is not being made.
(c) Within thirty (30) days following each internal inspection made by
its inspectors, each insurance company shall file a copy of the internal
inspection report and date of the inspection with the Boiler Inspection
Division Section on forms approved by the Division of Labor Secretary of the
Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee.
(d)(1) Each insurance company shall file a report annually of all
boilers insured and inspected showing location, owner, state number, and date
of last inspection.
(2) The report shall be filed not later than January 30 of each
calendar year.
(e)(1) If annual reports are not filed with the Boiler Inspection
Division Section by insurance companies who have insurance on boilers in the
State of Arkansas within sixty (60) days from the date they are due
inspection, the Boiler Inspection Division Section shall make the required
inspection.
(2) A special inspection fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for
each boiler or unfired pressure vessel inspected, plus mileage and expenses
from Little Rock to point of inspection and return not to exceed the current
rate authorized by the General Assembly to employees of state agencies who
furnish their own transportation, plus any meals and hotel bills incurred
shall be charged to the insurance company insuring the boilers or unfired
pressure vessels unless an extension of time is granted by the Chief
Inspector of the Boiler Inspection Division Section.
(f) No operating certificate issued for an insured boiler inspected by
an insurance company inspector shall be valid after the boiler for which it
was issued shall cease to be insured by a company authorized by this state to
carry the insurance.

03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
SECTION 119. Arkansas Code § 20-23-404 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-404. Operators.
(a)(1) The Boiler Inspection Division Section or an authorized
representative of the Boiler Inspection Section shall conduct examinations
for each applicant seeking a boiler operator's license.
(2) The examination may be either written or oral shall be
written.
(3) Each applicant shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars
($25.00) for the examination and the first license.
(4) Each license shall be renewed annually. The annual fee shall
be seventeen dollars ($17.00).
(5) Before the applicant may participate in an examination, he
or she shall have had not less than six (6) months of on-the-job training.
Proof of this on-the-job training shall be furnished to the Division of Labor
Boiler Inspection Section by the employer before the examination.
(6) A restricted license may be issued to an applicant who has
passed the examination required in this subsection but who has not met the
requirements of subdivision (a)(5) of this section, provided that:
(A) The restricted license shall be effective for one (1)
year from the date of issue; and
(B) The licensee is to work under the direction and
supervision of a regularly licensed boiler operator.
(b)(1) Any operator found operating a boiler without a certificate
issued by the Boiler Inspection Division Section or operating a boiler
knowing it to be defective shall have his or her license revoked at once.
(2) Any person found operating a boiler without an operator's
license shall be subject to an administrative fine of not less than twenty-
five dollars ($25.00) and not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

SECTION 120. Arkansas Code § 20-23-405 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-405. Sellers, installers, and repairers, and inspection service
providers.
(a)(1) All persons, firms, or corporations engaged in the sale, or
installation, or inspection services of boilers, unfired pressure vessels,
hot water storage containers, or pressure piping in any location shall be
licensed by the Boiler Inspection Division Section to perform the work.
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(2) The annual license fee shall be seventy-five dollars
($75.00) per year, payable in advance on or before January 31 of each
calendar year.
(b)(1) All persons, firms, or corporations engaged in the repair of
boilers or unfired pressure vessels shall be licensed by the division Boiler
Inspection Section.
(2) The annual license fee shall be seventy-five dollars
($75.00) annually, payable in advance on or before January 31 of each
calendar year.
(c) Each person, firm, or corporation shall furnish evidence suitable
to the division Boiler Inspection Section that the person, firm, or
coporation corporation is qualified to perform the work.
(d) The license of any person, firm, or corporation may be revoked by
the division Boiler Inspection Section upon proof that the person, firm, or
corporation is not performing the work in compliance with this chapter and
the rules as provided in this chapter.
(e) Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of
not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years or by both fine
and imprisonment.
(f) The provisions of §§ 20-23-104, 20-23-307 — 20-23-309, 20-23-
403, 20-23-404, and this section shall not apply to firms under the
regulation of the United States Surface Transportation Board.

SECTION 121. Arkansas Code § 20-23-406 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-406. Restricted lifetime license – Certificate of competency and
commission.
(a)(1)(A) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time
thereafter, any person who has been a boiler inspector for no fewer than
twelve (12) years may apply for a restricted lifetime boiler inspector's
certificate of competency and commission.
(B) The certificate of competency and commission shall be
issued upon satisfactory proof of age and upon payment of a fee prescribed by
the division Boiler Inspection Section.
(2)(A) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
thereafter, any person who has been a boiler operator for no fewer than
twelve (12) years may apply for a restricted lifetime boiler operator's
license.
(B) The license shall be issued upon satisfactory proof of
age and upon payment of a fee prescribed by the division Boiler Inspection
Section.
(3)(A) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time
thereafter, any person who has been engaged in the sale or installation of
boilers, unfired pressure vessels, hot water storage containers, or pressure
piping for no fewer than twelve (12) years may apply for a restricted
lifetime license.
(B) The license shall be issued upon satisfactory proof of
age and upon payment of a fee prescribed by the division Boiler Inspection
Section.
(4)(A) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time
thereafter, any person who has been engaged in the repair of boilers or
unfired pressure vessels for no fewer than twelve (12) years may apply for a
restricted lifetime license.
(B) The license shall be issued upon satisfactory proof of
age and upon payment of a fee prescribed by the division Boiler Inspection
Section.
(b) The division Boiler Inspection Section shall promulgate rules
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

SECTION 122. Arkansas Code § 20-23-407 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-407. Owner or user inspection programs.
(a) Any owner or user of a steam boiler or pressure vessel subject to
this chapter may perform any inspections required by this chapter on such
vessels owned or operated by the owner or user if the owner or user meets the
requirements prescribed by rule of the Director of the Division of Labor
Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee.
(b) The director secretary or his or her designee shall set out
requirements for the certification of owner or user inspectors and
certification of owner or user inspection programs by rule and shall have
full authority to promulgate and enforce those rules.
(c)(1)(A) After notice and opportunity for hearing, any owner or user
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
who is found to have violated rules prescribed by the director secretary or
his or her designee pursuant to this subchapter shall be assessed a civil
monetary penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(B) Each day that a violation continues shall be
considered a separate violation.
(2) The director secretary or his or her designee may bring a
civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the amount of
any civil monetary penalties.
(d) In addition to civil monetary penalties, any owner or user who is
found to be in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.

SECTION 123. Arkansas Code § 20-24-101(2), concerning definitions
pertaining to elevators, dumbwaiters, and escalators, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) “Authorized representative” means the building department of
cities, towns, or other governmental subdivisions designated by the Division
of Occupational and Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Department
of Labor and Licensing to enforce certain provisions of this chapter;

SECTION 124. Arkansas Code § 20-24-101(11), concerning definitions
pertaining to elevators, dumbwaiters, and escalators, is amended to read as
follows:
(11) “Freight elevator” means an elevator used for carrying
freight and on which are permitted to ride only the operator and the persons
necessary for loading and unloading and such other designated persons who may
be authorized by the rules of the Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement
Licensing Board;

SECTION 125. Arkansas Code § 20-24-103 is amended to read as follows:
20-24-103. Penalties – Prosecution of violations.
(a)(1) A person, owner, lessee, partnership, association, corporation,
licensee, or inspector who violates this chapter or a rule adopted by the
Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board is subject to a civil
fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.
(2) Each day during which a violation continues shall be a
separate offense.
(b) An action for recovery of the penalties provided by this section
shall be instituted by the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions or its authorized representative Secretary
of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee and shall be
in the form of a civil action before a court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) In addition to the penalties in subsection (a) of this section,
the Director of the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions secretary or his or her designee may
petition a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin or restrain violations
of this chapter or a rule adopted by the board.

SECTION 126. Arkansas Code § 20-24-104 is amended to read as follows:
20-24-104. Enforcement.
(a) Except when otherwise provided, the Division of Occupational and
Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and
Licensing shall have the power, and it shall be its duty, to enforce this
chapter and the rules adopted by the Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement
Licensing Board.
(b) In cities, towns, or other governmental subdivisions having a
building department with qualified personnel to enforce this chapter or
portions thereof, the Director of the Division of Occupational and
Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Secretary of the Department of
Labor and Licensing or his or her designee may delegate the building
department as the authorized representative of the division Department of
Labor and Licensing to enforce and carry out the provisions of §§ 20-24-
112 — 20-24-116 or any portion thereof as may be designated by him or her.

SECTION 127. Arkansas Code § 20-24-105 is repealed.
20-24-105. Elevator Safety Board — Creation — Members.
(a) There is created the Elevator Safety Board, consisting of six (6)
members, one (1) of whom shall be the Secretary of the Department of Labor
and Licensing or his or her designee, who shall serve continuously, and five
(5) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four (4) years.
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(b) Upon the death, resignation, or incapacity of any member, the
Governor shall fill the vacancy, for the remainder of the unexpired term,
with a representative of the same interests as those of his or her
predecessor.
(c) Of the five (5) members appointed by the Governor:
(1) One (1) shall be a representative of the owners and lessees
of elevators within this state;
(2) One (1) shall be a representative of the manufacturers of
elevators used within this state;
(3) One (1) shall be a representative of an insurance company
authorized to insure the operation of elevators in this state;
(4) One (1) shall be a representative of the public at large;
and
(5) One (1) shall be appointed by the Governor after consulting
with the board of trustees of the Elevator Industry Work Preservation Fund
and subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(d) The board shall meet at the call of the secretary who shall
designate in the call the time and place of the meeting.
(e) The members except the secretary may receive expense reimbursement
and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

SECTION 128. Arkansas Code § 20-24-106(a), concerning the powers and
duties of the Elevator Safety Board, is amended to read as follows:
(a) It shall be the duty of the Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement
Licensing Board to license elevator inspectors, elevator mechanics, elevator
testing contractors, and elevator contractors as provided in this chapter and
to revoke or suspend any such license for cause.

SECTION 129. Arkansas Code § 20-24-107(a)(1), concerning the adoption
of rules by the Elevator Safety Board, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A public hearing shall be held by the Elevator Safety Board Code
Enforcement Licensing Board before the adoption of any rules authorized by
this chapter.

SECTION 130. Arkansas Code § 20-24-108(a), concerning qualifications
for the licensure of conveyance inspections, is amended to read as follows:
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(a)(1) The inspections of conveyances required by this chapter shall
be made by an elevator inspector licensed by the Elevator Safety Board Code
Enforcement Licensing Board.
(2) To be eligible for a license to inspect conveyances, the
applicant or licensee shall:
(A) Have experience in designing, installing, maintaining,
or inspecting conveyances to the extent established by rules of the board;
(B) Successfully pass a written examination approved by
the board;
(C)(i) Submit with his or her application for a license or
renewal of a license proof of an insurance policy:
(a) Issued by an insurance company authorized
to do business in Arkansas; and
(b) Providing general liability coverage for
at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) for injury or death of a person and
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for property damage.
(ii) The provision for liability insurance required
by subdivision (a)(2)(C)(i) of this section shall not apply to elevator
inspectors employed by the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing; and
(D)(i) Have no financial interest in any business or
operation which manufactures, installs, repairs, modifies, or services
conveyances.
(ii) This qualification does not prohibit an employee
of an insurance company insuring conveyances from obtaining a license as an
elevator inspector.

SECTION 131. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-24-
108(c)(2), concerning application requirements, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) To be eligible for an elevator contractor license or
elevator testing contractor license, the applicant or licensee shall:

SECTION 132. Arkansas Code § 20-24-109 is amended to read as follows:
20-24-109. Application and examination for licenses – Issuance and
renewal.
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
(a)(1) A written application for the examination and license for
elevator inspector, elevator mechanic, elevator testing contractor, or
elevator contractor shall be made upon a form to be supplied by the Elevator
Safety Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board upon request and shall be
accompanied by a statement of the applicant's experience together with an
examination fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(2) The examination shall be given not more than six (6) months
from the date when the applicant makes the application.
(3)(A) If the applicant is qualified and successfully passes the
applicable examination specified in this section, then upon payment of a
license fee, he or she shall be entitled to: a one-year license as an
elevator inspector, elevator mechanic, elevator testing contractor, or
elevator contractor.
(i) A one-year license as an elevator inspector or
elevator contractor; or
(ii) A two-year license as an elevator mechanic.
(B) The license fee and the license renewal fee shall be
established by the board, but in no event shall either fee exceed one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(4)(A) There shall be no limit to the number of times an
applicant may seek a license as provided in this section, except that a
rejected applicant may not make application within six (6) months from the
date on which he or she is notified that he or she has failed to qualify.
(B) A license fee shall be paid for the initial
examination and each subsequent examination.
(b) The board may license a person as an elevator inspector, elevator
mechanic, elevator testing contractor, or elevator contractor without
examination if he or she holds an equivalent license for a state or city that
has a standard of examination substantially equal to that provided for in §
20-24-108.
(c) The board shall renew a license after receiving:
(1) Payment of the license renewal fee; and
(2) Submission of proof that the licensee has satisfied the
continuing education requirements established by rule of the board.
(d)(1) Whenever an emergency exists and the board determines that
there are not enough licensed elevator mechanics to perform the work
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
necessary to provide for the safety of life, limb, and property and to
protect the public welfare, the board may waive the requirements of this
chapter and issue an emergency elevator mechanic license that may be valid
for no longer than thirty (30) days.
(2) Whenever the board determines that there are not enough
licensed elevator mechanics available to perform work necessary for the
completion of a project for which the Division of Occupational and
Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and
Licensing has issued a permit under § 20-24-115(d), the board may waive the
requirements of this chapter and issue a temporary elevator mechanic license
that may be valid for no longer than thirty (30) days.
(3) The board may renew an emergency or temporary license if the
circumstances justifying its original issuance continue.

SECTION 133. Arkansas Code § 20-24-110(c), concerning prohibited
activities of elevator inspectors, is amended to read as follows:
(c) No elevator inspector shall recommend or refer one (1) of his or
her clients or customers to a specific business, firm, or corporation which
manufactures, installs, repairs, alters, tests, or services elevators,
escalators, or dumbwaiters.

SECTION 134. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-24-
110(d), concerning financial disclosure statement required of elevator
inspectors, is amended to read as follows:
(d) On or before the last day of January of each year, all licensed
elevator inspectors shall file with the Department of Labor and Licensing a
financial disclosure statement on forms provided by the department and
approved by the Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board. Such
forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

SECTION 135. Arkansas Code § 20-24-111 is amended to read as follows:
20-24-111. Maintenance.
Every elevator, dumbwaiter, and escalator shall be maintained by the
owner or lessee in a safe operating condition so that it conforms to the
rules and requirements of the Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement
Licensing Board as adopted under § 20-24-107(a) and (b).
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493

SECTION 136. Arkansas Code § 20-24-112(a)(1) and (2), concerning
testing and inspection requirements of elevators, dumbwaiters, and
escalators, are amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) Every new or altered elevator, dumbwaiter, and escalator
shall be inspected and tested in conformity with the applicable rules adopted
by the Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board before the
operating permit required by § 20-24-116 is issued.
(B) The inspections shall be made by a licensed elevator
inspector in the employ of the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing or its
authorized representative;
(2)(A) The owner or lessee of every existing passenger elevator
or escalator shall cause it to be inspected within three (3) months, and the
owner or lessee of every existing freight elevator and dumbwaiter shall cause
it to be inspected within six (6) months after the effective date of the
rules adopted by the board under § 20-24-107(a) and (b).
(B) However, the division department or its authorized
representative, at its discretion, may extend the time specified in this
subdivision (a)(2) for making inspections; and

SECTION 137. Arkansas Code § 20-24-113(a)(2), concerning inspection
reports of elevators, dumbwaiters, and escalators, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) For the inspections required by § 20-24-112(a)(2), the
report shall include all information required by the department in order to
determine whether the owner or lessee of the elevator, escalator, or
dumbwaiter has complied with rules adopted by the Elevator Safety Board Code
Enforcement Licensing Board under § 20-24-107(a) and (b) that are applicable.

SECTION 138. Arkansas Code § 20-24-114 is amended to read as follows:
20-24-114. Additional inspections.
In addition to required inspections, the Department of Labor and
Licensing or its authorized representative may designate a licensed inspector
in its employ to make such additional inspections as may be required to
enforce this chapter and the rules adopted by the Elevator Safety Board Code
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
Enforcement Licensing Board under § 20-24-107(a) and (b).

SECTION 139. Arkansas Code § 20-24-115(a)(1), concerning new
construction, relocation, or alterations to elevators, dumbwaiters, and
escalators, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) On and after the effective date of rules adopted by the
Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board under § 20-24-
107(a) and (b), detailed plans and specifications of the elevator,
dumbwaiter, or escalator to be thereafter installed, relocated, or altered
shall be submitted by the contractor, or in the absence of an installing
contractor, by a person or the owner, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing. An application for a construction or alteration permit on forms to
be furnished or approved by the department shall be submitted at the same
time.

SECTION 140. Arkansas Code § 20-24-116(c)(1), concerning operating
permits, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If the inspection report required by § 20-24-113 indicates
failure of compliance with the applicable rules approved by the Elevator
Safety Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board under § 20-24-107 or with the
detailed plans and specifications approved by the department or its
authorized representative under § 20-24-115(d) and (e), the department or its
authorized representative shall give notice to the owner or lessee or the
person filing plans and specifications of changes necessary for compliance
with the rules. After the changes have been made, the department or its
authorized representative shall issue an operating permit.

SECTION 141. Arkansas Code § 20-24-119(a), concerning appeals relating
to elevators, dumbwaiters, and escalators, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Any person aggrieved by an order or act of the Department of Labor
and Licensing or its authorized representative under this chapter may, within
fifteen (15) days after notice thereof, appeal from the order or act to the
Elevator Safety Board Code Enforcement Licensing Board, which shall, within
thirty (30) days thereafter, hold a hearing of which at least fifteen (15)
days’ written notice shall be given to all interested parties.

03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
SECTION 142. Arkansas Code § 20-31-104(a), concerning statewide
standards for electrical facilities and the performance of electrical work,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) Beginning January 1, 1992, the Board of Electrical Examiners of
the State of Arkansas The Code Enforcement Licensing Board is empowered to
adopt rules to establish statewide standards for the construction,
installation, and maintenance of electrical facilities and the performance of
electrical work.

SECTION 143. Arkansas Code § 20-31-104(f), concerning the enforcement
of statewide standards for electrical facilities and the performance of
electrical work, is amended to read as follows:
(f) It shall be the duty of the Division of Labor Department of Labor
and Licensing to administer and enforce this chapter.

SECTION 144. Arkansas Code § 20-31-105(c)(2), concerning penalties
relating to the maintenance of electrical facilities or performance of
electrical work, is amended to read as follows:
(2) To seek the suspension or revocation by the Board of
Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code Enforcement Licensing
Board of any an “electrical contractor”, a “master electrician”, a
“journeyman electrician”, or an “industrial maintenance electrician” licensed
under § 17-28-101 et seq. who is found to be in violation of this chapter.

SECTION 145. Arkansas Code § 25-15-104(a)(1)(F), concerning the
subpoena powers of certain boards and commissions, is repealed:
(F) Committee of Plumbing Examiners, § 17-38-202;

SECTION 146. Arkansas Code § 25-15-104(a)(1)(H), concerning the
subpoena powers of certain boards and commissions, is amended to read as
follows:
(H) HVACR Licensing Board, § 17-33-201 et seq.; Code
Enforcement Licensing Board, § 17-28-201 et seq., § 17-33-201 et seq., and §
20-24-101 et seq.;

SECTION 147. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(17), concerning stipend
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
authorization for certain state boards, is amended to read as follows:
(17) Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas Code
Enforcement Licensing Board;

SECTION 148. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(22), concerning stipend
authorization for certain state boards, is repealed.
(22) Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board;

SECTION 149. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(25), concerning stipend
authorization for certain state boards, is repealed.
(25) HVACR Licensing Board;

SECTION 150. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(51), concerning stipend
authorization for certain state boards, is repealed.
(51) Committee of Plumbing Examiners;

SECTION 151. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(54), concerning stipend
authorization for certain state boards, is repealed.
(54) Elevator Safety Board;

SECTION 152. Arkansas Code § 25-43-802(a)(32), concerning state
entities transferred to the Department of Health, is repealed.
(32) The Committee of Plumbing Examiners, created under § 17-38-
202;

SECTION 153. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1102(a)(2), concerning state
entities transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing, is repealed.
(2) The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board, created
under § 20-22-606;

SECTION 154. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1102(a)(11), concerning state
entities transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing, is amended to
read as follows:
(11) The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas,
created under § 17-28-201 The Code Enforcement Licensing Board, created under
§ 17-33-201;
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493

SECTION 155. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1102(a)(14), concerning state
entities transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing, is repealed.
(14) The Elevator Safety Board under § 20-24-105;

SECTION 156. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1102(a)(15), concerning state
entities transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing, is repealed.
(15) The HVACR Licensing Board, created under § 17-33-201;

SECTION 157. DO NOT CODIFY. HVACR Class C license transfer.
As of September 1, 2025, all active and current Class C license holders
will be Class B license holders and may perform all HVACR work previously
permitted with a Class C license and that of a Class B license.

SECTION 158. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Transfer of funds.
(a) On the effective date of this act, all income, funds, revenue, and
unexpended balances of appropriations and all revenue collected in connection
with the performance of the powers, functions, and duties of an entity or a
function transferred under this act to the Code Enforcement Licensing Board
shall be transferred to the Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund, including
without limitation:
(1) Any fund repealed by this act;
(2) Any funds or the right to receive any funds of any entity or
function transferred by this act to the Code Enforcement Licensing Board; and
(3) Any other revenue as may be authorized by law.
(b) Any appropriations authorized by the 95th General Assembly from
the HVACR Licensing Fund and the Fire Protection Licensing Fund shall be
deemed appropriated and payable from the Code Enforcement Licensing Board
Fund.

SECTION 159. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Transition
provisions — Appointment of members of the Code Enforcement Licensing Board.
(a) Upon the effective date of this act, the Governor shall appoint
all board member positions for the Code Enforcement Licensing Board, subject
to confirmation by the Senate.
(b) Until at least seven (7) members of the board are duly appointed
03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061

SB493
and confirmed by the Senate, the Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee shall exercise the powers and duties
assigned to the board, except that the hearing and adjudication of a
complaint filed with the board shall be continued until a quorum of the newly
constituted board may be assembled to hear and adjudicate the complaint.

SECTION 160. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act preserves the public
peace, health, and safety as it will allow state government services to be
provided in a more efficient and cost-effective manner; that the abolishment
of certain boards and commissions and transfer of functions, powers, duties,
property, funds, and funding sources as special revenues to the newly created
Code Enforcement Licensing Board and Code Enforcement Licensing Board Fund
should become effective on July 1, 2025, to coincide with the appropriation
bills of the Department of Labor and Licensing and ensure that the Code
Enforcement Licensing Board provides its expanded vital services as the
transfer of duties is implemented and does not experience any issues with
funding under the transfer of duties. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace,
health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
















03/17/2025 4:32:26 PM LGL061